

Claymore Exchange-Traded Fund Trust 2 - Guggenheim Solar ETF: Private Company Information - Bloomberg









































  





















































































July 28, 2017 5:06 AM ET
Capital Markets

Company Overview of Claymore Exchange-Traded Fund Trust 2 - Guggenheim Solar ETF



Snapshot People




Company Overview
Claymore Exchange-Traded Fund Trust 2 - Guggenheim Solar ETF is an exchange traded fund launched by Guggenheim Investments, Inc. The fund is managed by Guggenheim Funds Investment Advisors, LLC. It invests in the public equity markets of developed countries across the globe. The fund seeks to invest in stocks of companies operating in the solar energy sector, including companies that produce solar power equipment and products for end-users, companies that produce fabrication products or services, supply raw materials or components to solar power equipment producers or integrators, and companies involved in solar power system sales, distribution, installation, integration or financing and spe...
Claymore Exchange-Traded Fund Trust 2 - Guggenheim Solar ETF is an exchange traded fund launched by Guggenheim Investments, Inc. The fund is managed by Guggenheim Funds Investment Advisors, LLC. It invests in the public equity markets of developed countries across the globe. The fund seeks to invest in stocks of companies operating in the solar energy sector, including companies that produce solar power equipment and products for end-users, companies that produce fabrication products or services, supply raw materials or components to solar power equipment producers or integrators, and companies involved in solar power system sales, distribution, installation, integration or financing and specialize in selling electricity derived from solar power. It invests in stocks of companies across all market capitalizations, with a market capitalization greater than or equal to $150 million. The fund seeks to replicate the performance of the MAC Global Solar Energy Index, by investing in stocks of companies as per their weightings in the Index. It was formerly known as Claymore Exchange-Traded Fund Trust 2 - Claymore/MAC Global Solar Energy Index ETF. Claymore Exchange-Traded Fund Trust 2 - Guggenheim Solar ETF was formed on April 15, 2008 and is domiciled in the United States.
Detailed Description


227 West Monroe Street7th FloorChicago, IL 60606United StatesFounded in 2008



Phone: 312-827-0100

gi.guggenheiminvestments.com/products/etf/tan







Key Executives for Claymore Exchange-Traded Fund Trust 2 - Guggenheim Solar ETF




Mr. Donald Christopher Cacciapaglia


      	Chief Executive Officer and Trustee
      


Age: 66
        







Mr. John L. Sullivan


      	Chief Financial Officer, Chief Accounting Officer and Treasurer
      


Age: 62
        







Mr. Mark E. Mathiasen


      	Secretary
      


Age: 39
        







Mr. Stevens T. Kelly


      	Assistant Secretary
      


Age: 35
        







Mr. James Howley CPA


      	Assistant Treasurer
      


Age: 45
        




Compensation as of Fiscal Year 2017. 



Similar Private Companies By Industry



Company Name
Region



 @Visory LLC United States 1 Road Partners LLC United States 11T Partners, LLC United States 123Jump.com, Inc. United States 1509225 Ontario, Inc. United States




Recent Private Companies Transactions



TypeDate
Target



No transactions available in the past 12 months.




Request Profile Update

















 












The information and data displayed in this profile are created and managed by S&P Global Market Intelligence, a division of S&P Global. Bloomberg.com does not create or control the content. For inquiries, please contact S&P Global Market Intelligence directly by clicking 
	here.




Stock Quotes


Market data is delayed at least 15 minutes.







Company Lookup



Most Searched Private Companies



Company Name
Geographic Region



 Lawyers Committee for Civil Rights Under Law United States NYC2012, Inc. United States The Advertising Council, Inc. United States Bertelsmann AG Europe Rush University United States













Sponsored Financial Commentaries

Sponsored Links






Browse Companies
A
B
C
D
E
F
G
H
I
J
K
L
M
N
O
P
Q
R
S
T
U
V
W
X
Y
Z
 | 
0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9






Request Profile Update

						Only a company representative may request an update for the company profile. Documentation will be required.
					  
To contact Claymore Exchange-Traded Fund Trust 2 - Guggenheim Solar ETF, please visit gi.guggenheiminvestments.com/products/etf/tan.  Company data is provided by S&P Global Market Intelligence.  Please use this form to report any data issues.
					  


Information Missing - Please enter your information in the following field(s): 




Company Name

Your Name*

Your E-Mail Address*

Your Phone Number*

Type of Data*


Overview
Executives
Key developments
Similar companies
Transactions


Update Needed*

All data changes require verification from public sources.  Please include the correct value or values and a source where we can verify.


Cancel


Submit






Your requested update has been submitted
Our data partners will research the update request and update the information on this page if necessary. Research and follow-up could take several weeks. If you have questions, you can contact them at bwwebmaster@businessweek.com.


Close





























Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft












Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft












Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft


















Claymore Exchange-Traded Funds Renamed Guggenheim Exchange-Traded Funds - TheStreet




























































 

 




















Action Alerts PLUS

Access AAPJim Cramer's Best Stocks for 2017Charitable Trust PortfolioMost Recent Trade Alert25 Investing Rules10 Trading Commandments

Real Money

Access RM25 Rules of InvestingJim Cramer's Best Stocks for 201710 CommandmentsStressed Out StocksCramer's Blog

Cramer
Mad Money
ETFs
Futures
Markets
Much More

BanksBiotechRetailTechPersonal FinanceRetirementFinancial Advisor CenterHow to SpendOptionsFixed IncomeVideo










Privacy Policy|Terms of Use© 1996- TheStreet Inc. All rights reserved
















                                DJIA
                            







                                NASDAQ
                            







                                S&P 500
                            






Market Data updated






Sign In




Your Membership(s)








Your Account





Account Preferences


Alerts


Newsletters







Subscribe





Logout



Subscribe

Access insights and guidance from our Wall Street pros. Find the product that's right for you.
Action Alerts PLUS
Action Alerts OPTIONS
Daily Swing Trade
Income Seeker
Quant Ratings
Real Money
Real Money Pro
Stocks Under $10
Top Stocks
Trifecta Stocks
Real Money Pro Portfolio
Chairman's Club
Compare All 
Chatter on the Street













































 








































Claymore Exchange-Traded Funds Renamed Guggenheim Exchange-Traded Funds






Business Wire




Sep 27, 2010 7:00 AM EDT













 


















































  In conjunction with today’s announcement regarding the Claymore Securities, Inc. name change to Guggenheim Funds Distributors, Inc. (“Guggenheim Funds”), many of the firm’s ETFs have been renamed while their respective ticker symbols and CUSIPs remain unchanged.  The table below lists the name changes. Further information regarding Guggenheim Funds’ ETF products is available at the Guggenheim Funds website www.guggenheimfunds.com.                                   Tickers           Prior Fund Name           New Fund Name      BSCB            Claymore BulletShares 2011 Corporate Bond ETF           Guggenheim BulletShares 2011 Corporate Bond ETF      BSCC            Claymore BulletShares 2012 Corporate Bond ETF           Guggenheim BulletShares 2012 Corporate Bond ETF      BSCD            Claymore BulletShares 2013 Corporate Bond ETF           Guggenheim BulletShares 2013 Corporate Bond ETF      BSCE            Claymore BulletShares 2014 Corporate Bond ETF           Guggenheim BulletShares 2014 Corporate Bond ETF      BSCF            Claymore BulletShares 2015 Corporate Bond ETF           Guggenheim BulletShares 2015 Corporate Bond ETF      BSCG            Claymore BulletShares 2016 Corporate Bond ETF           Guggenheim BulletShares 2016 Corporate Bond ETF      BSCH            Claymore BulletShares 2017 Corporate Bond ETF           Guggenheim BulletShares 2017 Corporate Bond ETF      CGW           Claymore S&P Global Water Index ETF           Guggenheim S&P Global Water Index ETF      CQQQ           Claymore China Technology ETF           Guggenheim China Technology ETF      CSD           Claymore/Beacon Spin-Off ETF           Guggenheim Spin-Off ETF      CUT           Claymore/Beacon Global Timber Index ETF           Guggenheim Timber ETF      CVY            Claymore/Zacks Multi-Asset Income Index ETF           Guggenheim Multi-Asset Income ETF      CZA           Claymore/Zacks Mid-Cap Core ETF           Guggenheim Mid-Cap Core ETF      DEF           Claymore/Sabrient Defensive Equity Index ETF           Guggenheim Defensive Equity ETF      EEB           Claymore/BNY Mellon BRIC ETF           Guggenheim BRIC ETF      EEN           Claymore/BNY Mellon EW Euro-Pacific LDRs ETF           Guggenheim EW Euro-Pacific LDRs ETF      ENY           Claymore/SWM Canadian Energy Income Index ETF           Guggenheim Canadian Energy Income ETF      FAA           Claymore/NYSE Arca Airline ETF           Guggenheim Airline ETF      FRN           Claymore/BNY Mellon Frontier Markets ETF           Guggenheim Frontier Markets ETF      HAO           Claymore/AlphaShares China Small Cap Index ETF           Guggenheim China Small Cap ETF      HGI            Claymore/Zacks International Multi-Asset Income Index ETF            Guggenheim International Multi-Asset Income ETF      LVL           Claymore/S&P Global Dividend Opportunities Index ETF           Guggenheim S&P Global Dividend Opportunities Index ETF      NFO           Claymore/Sabrient Insider ETF           Guggenheim Insider Sentiment ETF      OTP           Claymore/Ocean Tomo Patent ETF           Guggenheim Ocean Tomo Patent ETF      OTR           Claymore/Ocean Tomo Growth Index ETF           Guggenheim Ocean Tomo Growth Index ETF      RYJ           Claymore/Raymond James SB-1 Equity ETF           Guggenheim Raymond James SB-1 Equity ETF      SEA           Claymore Shipping ETF           Guggenheim Shipping ETF      TAN           Claymore/MAC Global Solar Energy Index ETF           Guggenheim Solar ETF      TAO           Claymore/AlphaShares China Real Estate ETF           Guggenheim China Real Estate ETF      XGC           Claymore/BNY Mellon International Small Cap LDRs ETF           Guggenheim International Small Cap LDRs ETF      XRO           Claymore/Zacks Sector Rotation ETF           Guggenheim Sector Rotation ETF      YAO           Claymore/AlphaShares China All-Cap ETF           Guggenheim China All-Cap ETF                              For additional information, shareholders in these ETFs may call their financial advisor or Guggenheim Funds at 800-345-7999.  



 








 































































 











Trending


FTC Seen as Set to Block Rite Aid Deal


It Would Be 'Crazy' to Clean House at Wells Fargo, CEO Says


McDonald's Has a Restaurant in Poland That Looks Like the Future of the Golden Arches


15 Foods to Avoid if You Have High Cholesterol


Reversal of Fortunes: Cramer's 'Mad Money' Recap (Thursday 7/27/17)











Advertising Partners



 






 






 






 


























 

























 































 


©1996-2017 TheStreet, Inc. All rights reserved.Action Alerts PLUS is a registered trademark of TheStreet, Inc.




Compare Brokers



 







 







 







 







 







 














	Exchange Traded Funds (ETFs) | Guggenheim Investments




















































Home 
ETF








 

 



        — OR —
    




                    Select a Category
                    


Category
Fixed-Income
Core
Developing Market
Equal Weight
Pure Style
Strategies
Target Beta
Investment Strategies
Smart Beta
Equity
Sector
Thematic
Active








Search Type:

All
Sector
Holdings

 

Sector:

Select Sector...
Consumer Discretionary
Consumer Staples
Energy
Financials
Health Care
Industrials
Information Technology
Materials
Real Estate
Telecommunication Services
Utilities


 

0%

100%
 Weightings

 

Includes:

All
Any

 








                 
            










 
 
 




 


 


 












ETF Strategies

 







Equal Weight




Get equal exposure to every stock in a portfolio—regardless of market capitalization for outperformance potential.








BulletShares®




Combines the precision of individual bonds with the advantages of ETFs.





 




Active Fixed Income




Our strength across actively-managed fixed-income strategies is a result of our time-tested investment process.



 




Pure Style




Get precise style exposure across large-, mid- and small-capitalizations by eliminating blend stocks and resulting style overlap.







ETF Education

Learn More

 



What are ETFs?
Learn the basics of ETFs and how they may benefit a portfolio


 



ETFs vs. Mutual Funds vs. Stocks
Find out the differences and similarities between these investment choices


 



Why ETFs
Cost-efficient, transparent, convenience. Discover the many benefits of ETFs in a portfolio


 



How to Use ETFs
Core strategies. Opportunistic exposure. Income opportunities. Learn the many ways that ETFs can be used in a portfolio


 



How Are ETFs Priced?
Investors should have an understanding of three different types of ETF prices.








ETF Spotlights

View All

 




Industry’s First Smart Beta ETF Cuts Fee in Half
Effective June 30, 2017, Guggenheim S&P 500® Equal Weight ETF (RSP) lowered its fee to 0.20% from 0.40%. The fee reduction reflects increased adoption of the $13.5 billion RSP as a core equity holding in investor portfolios and Guggenheim’s desire to benefit existing shareholders and to make RSP more accessible to institutional and individual investors.
Learn More


 



Guggenheim Launches Multi-Factor ETF
Guggenheim Multi-Factor Large Cap ETF (GMFL) offers an advanced multi-factor approach by utilizing seven diversifying fundamental and non-fundamental factors to potentially provide more stable returns over a variety of economic cycles.
Learn More


 

 

Build Your Bond Ladder
Create hypothetical illustrations of BulletShares laddered strategies, based on your desired maturity and credit criteria with the Guggenheim BulletShares® ETF Bond Laddering Tool.
Start Now

 

 



Discover Three Trends Driving Infrastructure
In today’s low interest environment, infrastructure securities may offer capital appreciation and attractive income potential. Discover what is driving the need for infrastructure in developed and developing economies.
Learn More


 

 



Yield Calculator
Provides an approximation of the yield to maturity, based on the market price of the fund at the time of purchase.
Launch Calculator


 

 



Equal Weight Advantage
Equal weight investing is a smart beta strategy that does exactly what its name implies—it equally weights every stock in the strategy regardless of how small or large it is.
Learn More








Advisor Resources





 

Webcast: Addressing Investor's Needs w/Defined-Maturity ETFs







Not All Investments Are Created Equal







ETF Trading—An Overview for Advisors 














Subscribe to Our Perspectives

Your browser does not support iframes.


Your browser does not support iframes.




Follow us




















OUR FIRM
News

Press Releases

Firm Overview

Heritage
Guiding Principles
Careers


OUR PRODUCTS
Exchange Traded Funds

Unit Investment Trusts

Mutual Funds

Closed-End Funds

Currency Shares

Variable Insurance Funds

Indices


OUR PERSPECTIVES
Global CIO Outlook

Macroeconomic Research

Sector Views

Portfolio Strategy

Weekly Viewpoint

In the Media

Resources


SERVICES
Customer Service

My Account

Contact Us

Literature

 
      



PRIVACY POLICY


BUSINESS CONTINUITY


LEGAL INFORMATION








            Guggenheim Investments represents the investment management businesses of Guggenheim Partners, LLC ("Guggenheim").
         Guggenheim Funds Distributors, LLC is an affiliate of Guggenheim.
        



Read a prospectus and summary prospectus (if available) carefully before investing. It contains the investment objective, risks charges, expenses and the other information, which should be considered carefully before investing. To obtain a prospectus and summary prospectus (if available) click here or call 800.820.0888.
Investing involves risk, including the possible loss of principal.

*Guggenheim Investments total asset figure is as of 3.31.2017. The assets include leverage of $11.7bn for assets under management and $0.4bn for assets for which we provide administrative services.
            Guggenheim Investments represents the investment management businesses of Guggenheim Partners, LLC ("Guggenheim"), which includes Security Investors, LLC ("SI"), Guggenheim Funds Investment Advisors, LLC, ("GFIA") and Guggenheim Partners Investment Management ("GPIM") the investment advisers to the referenced funds. Securities offered through Guggenheim Funds Distributors, LLC, an affiliate of Guggenheim, SI, GFIA and GPIM.



        ©
            
        Guggenheim Investments. All rights reserved.
    

Research our firm with FINRA Broker Check.

• Not FDIC Insured • No Bank Guarantee • May Lose Value
This website is directed to and intended for use by citizens or residents of the United States of America only. The material provided on this website is not intended as a recommendation or as investment advice of any kind, including in connection with rollovers, transfers, and distributions. Such material is not provided in a fiduciary capacity, may not be relied upon for or in connection with the making of investment decisions, and does not constitute a solicitation of an offer to buy or sell securities. All content has been provided for informational or educational purposes only and is not intended to be and should not be construed as legal or tax advice and/or a legal opinion. Always consult a financial, tax and/or legal professional regarding your specific situation. Investing involves risk, including the possible loss of principal.




 



                    By choosing an option below, the next time you return to the site, your home page will automatically
                    be set to this site. You can change your preference at any time.
                


 Institutional Investor
                    

 Financial Professional
                    

 Individual Investor
                    
Save










                We have saved your site preference as Institutional Investors. To change this, update your preferences.
            







×
 



United States Important Legal Information
By confirming below that you are an Institutional Investor, you will gain access to information on this website (the “Website”) that is intended exclusively for Institutional Investors and, as such, the information should not be relied upon by individual investors. This Website and any product, content, information, tools or services provided or available through the Website (collectively, the “Services”) are provided to Institutional Investors for informational purposes only and do not constitute a recommendation to buy or sell any security or fund interest. Nothing on the Website shall be considered a solicitation for the offering of any investment product or service to any person in any jurisdiction where such solicitation or offering may not lawfully be made. By accessing this Website, you expressly acknowledge and agree that the Website and the Services provided on or through the Website are provided on an as is/as available basis, and except as partnered by law, neither Guggenheim Investments and it parents, subsidiaries and affiliates nor any third party has any responsibility to maintain the website or the Services offered on or through the Website or to supply corrections or updates for the same. You understand that the information provided on this Website is not intended to provide, and should not be relied upon for, tax, legal, accounting or investment advice. You also agree that the terms provided herein with respect to the access and use of the Website are supplemental to and shall not void or modify the Terms of Use in effect for the Website. The information on this Website is solely intended for use by Institutional Investors as defined below: banks, savings and loan associations, insurance companies, and registered investment companies; registered investment advisers; individual investors and other entities with total assets of at least $50 million; governmental entities; employee benefit (retirement) plans, or multiple employee benefit plans offered to employees of the same employer, that in the aggregate have at least 100 participants, but does not include any participant of such plans; member firms or registered person of such a member; or person(s) acting solely on behalf of any such Institutional Investor.
By clicking the "I confirm" information link the user agrees that: “I have read the terms detailed and confirm that I am an Institutional Investor and that I wish to proceed.”

                 

                

I confirm





                                Save Selection





















	BulletShares ETFs | Guggenheim Investments






















































Home ETF 
BulletShares




BulletShares® ETFs
 




 

Benefits & Applications
Maturity Process
Product List
BulletShares Resources

 





The Precision of Individual Bonds. The Advantages of ETFs.
Guggenheim BulletShares® ETFs are an innovative suite of fixed-term exchange traded funds (ETFs) that provide defined-maturity exposure through portfolios of either investment-grade or high yield corporate bonds, enabling investors to build customized portfolios tailored to specific maturity profiles, risk preferences and investment goals.
Each BulletShares® ETF invests in a diversified portfolio of individual bonds that all mature or are anticipated to be called in a specific year. Once reaching its designated maturity date, the BulletShares® ETF will return its net assets to shareholders.1
Benefits of BulletShares® ETFs
Guggenheim designed BulletShares® ETFs to combine the benefits of individual bonds with the advantages of ETFs. These innovative products provide:







Bond-like Experience in an ETF  


Combine the benefits of bonds—monthly income, final distribution at maturity1, as well as control of portfolio maturity, yield, and credit quality—with the advantages of ETFs—broad diversification2, liquidity, transparency, convenience, and cost-effectiveness.




Precise Exposure  


Provide targeted investment grade and high yield exposure, enabling investors to build customized portfolios tailored to specific maturity profiles, risk preferences and investment goals.




Ease of Use  


Provide a cost-effective and convenient way to build bond ladders and manage interest rate risk, via fixed-income ETFs with consecutively maturing years ranging from 2017 to 2026.





 



BulletShares® ETFs vs. Bonds and Bond Funds



 
Final Distribution at Maturity1
Enhanced Bond Exposure
Exchange-Traded Liquidity & Transparency
Precise Maturity Profile2
Access/Ease of Use
Professional Portfolio Management


BulletShares® ETFs

■


■


■


■


■


■



Traditional Fixed- Income ETFs
 

■


■

 

■


■



Traditional Fixed- Income Mutual Funds
 

■

 
 

■


■



Individual Bonds

■

 
 

■

 
 



 

Each of the investment products listed in the above table may have other benefits that are not highlighted.




Explore BulletShares® Portfolio Applications
BulletShares® ETFs allow you to customize your corporate bond portfolios to specific risk preferences, maturity profiles, and investment goals1. They can be used in a variety of portfolio applications.
 





Fill gaps in existing portfolios


Individual bonds mature, may be called, or even can default. Use BulletShares® ETFs to effectively fill gaps left in a portfolio, to gain targeted exposure to a particular segment of the bond market, or to enhance a portfolio’s overall diversification.






Obtain targeted yield-curve exposure


For Investors seeking to capture opportunities at particular points on the yield curve, BulletShares® ETFs offer an effective means of obtaining precise, targeted yield-curve exposure.






Create laddered portfolios


Bond laddering is a powerful tool to manage interest-rate risk, however, creating ladders with individual bonds can present a number of challenges: limited bond availability, liquidity and cost constraints, and concentrated bond exposure. BulletShares® ETFs offer a convenient and cost-effective approach to portfolio laddering with the added benefit of diversification3.




 





Barbell approach


Anticipating rising rates? Easily employ a barbell strategy by simultaneously overweighting BulletShares® ETFs with short-term and long-term maturity dates The longer-term ETFs lock into higher interest rates, while the shorter maturity date ETFs offer flexibility to reinvest in higher-yielding assets as rates rise.






Liability driven investing


Buying a house, paying for college, or funding your retirement are some relatively common life-stage expenses. BulletShares® ETFs, with their defined maturity dates, can be useful to fund these predictable liabilities. An investment in a BulletShares® ETF with a specific maturity year could be used to match an expenses due in that same specified year.
    







  

1 The funds do not seek to return any predetermined amount at maturity, and the amount an investor receives may be worth more or less than their original investment.
2 BulletShares® ETFs offer a specific or defined maturity date vs a traditional fixed-income ETF or mutual fund that has a perpetual maturity.
3 Diversification neither assures a profit nor eliminates the risk of experiencing investment losses.





Guggenheim BulletShares® Corporate Bond ETFs



Distribution Frequency: Monthly (if any)
Objective: Seek investment results that correspond generally to the performance, before the Funds' fees and expenses, of the corresponding BulletShares® USD Corporate Bond Index.
NYSE
			Arca
			Ticker


Guggenheim BulletShares 2017 Corporate Bond ETF
BSCH


Guggenheim BulletShares 2018 Corporate Bond ETF
BSCI


Guggenheim BulletShares 2019 Corporate Bond ETF
BSCJ


Guggenheim BulletShares 2020 Corporate Bond ETF
BSCK


Guggenheim BulletShares 2021 Corporate Bond ETF
BSCL


Guggenheim BulletShares 2022 Corporate Bond ETF
BSCM


Guggenheim BulletShares 2023 Corporate Bond ETF
BSCN


Guggenheim BulletShares 2024 Corporate Bond ETF
BSCO


Guggenheim BulletShares 2025 Corporate Bond ETF
BSCP


Guggenheim BulletShares 2026 Corporate Bond ETF
BSCQ





Guggenheim BulletShares® High Yield Corporate Bond ETFs



Distribution Frequency: Monthly (if any)
Objective: Seek investment results that correspond generally to the performance, before the Funds' fees and expenses, of the corresponding BulletShares® USD High Yield Corporate Bond Index.
NYSE
			Arca
			Ticker


Guggenheim BulletShares 2017 High Yield Corporate Bond ETF
BSJH


Guggenheim BulletShares 2018 High Yield Corporate Bond ETF
BSJI


Guggenheim BulletShares 2019 High Yield Corporate Bond ETF
BSJJ


Guggenheim BulletShares 2020 High Yield Corporate Bond ETF
BSJK


Guggenheim BulletShares 2021 High Yield Corporate Bond ETF
BSJL


Guggenheim BulletShares 2022 High Yield Corporate Bond ETF
BSJM


Guggenheim BulletShares 2023 High Yield Corporate Bond ETF
BSJN


Guggenheim BulletShares 2024 High Yield Corporate Bond ETF
BSJO






 



Guggenheim BulletShares® Brochure
This brochure lays out the advantages of building fixed income portfolios with BulletShares ETFs and strategic applications for use in portfolios.




The Benefits of Bond Laddering
Discover how bond laddering can help navigate uncertain interest rate environments and the benefits that ladders offer.




An In-Depth Look at Defined Maturity ETFs
Learn more about this innovative product, including how defined maturity ETFs can be used to obtain targeted exposure to specific points on the yield curve; how they compare to other investment vehicles; and their practical uses within a portfolio.




Anatomy of the BulletShares Maturity Process
This piece explains how the BulletShares maturity process works once the ETFs close.




BulletShares Prospectus







Build Your ETF Bond Ladder
With the Guggenheim BulletShares® ETF Bond Laddering Tool, you can create hypothetical illustrations of BulletShares laddered strategies, based on your desired maturity and credit criteria.




Innovations in Fixed Income Investing
Discover how BulletShares® ETFs combine the valuable features of both individual bonds and bond funds into one convenient, innovative and flexible investment.




×
Innovations in Fixed Income Investing


 









Understanding Defined Maturity ETFs
Learn more about the structure and operation of BulletShares® ETFs as well as their multiple uses in an investment portfolio




×
Understanding Defined Maturity ETFs


 









Understanding the BulletShares Maturity Process
Learn more about the structure and operation of BulletShares® ETFs as well as their multiple uses in an investment portfolio




×
Understanding the BulletShares Maturity Process


 










The BulletShares® Maturity Process


BulletShares® ETFs are comprised of individual bonds that all mature or are expected to be called in a specific year. While a traditional fixed-income ETF or mutual fund regularly buys and sells its underlying bonds to maintain a fixed duration, BulletShares® ETFs hold their bonds until they mature. This results in a more bond-like experience with a BulletShares® ETF’s duration shortening as it nears maturity.
In its final year, as a BulletShares® ETF’s underlying bonds mature, the proceeds from these bonds are typically invested in cash or cash alternatives. As the year progresses, the ETF’s cash and U.S. Treasury positions grow and its bond exposure decreases. Finally, at the end of the calendar year, the BulletShares® ETF terminates and the fund assets, less any fees and expenses of the fund, are distributed to shareholders.1
To date, Guggenheim has successfully transitioned all of its eleven maturing BulletShares® ETFs.



 



 




 



Opportunities for Reinvestment
As your 2017 BulletShares® ETF nears maturity, consider moving your maturity proceeds into another BulletShares® ETF. BulletShares offer a variety of maturities ranging from 2018 to 2026 to help investors meet their lifestyle and portfolio needs.
 

Matured BulletShares® ETF Summary



Ticker
ETF Name
Maturity Date
Final Net
			Asset Value
			Per Share


BSCG
Guggenheim BulletShares 2016 Corporate Bond ETF
12/31/2016
$22.08361


BSJG
Guggenheim BulletShares 2016 High Yield Corporate Bond ETF
12/31/2016
$25.81599


BSCF
Guggenheim BulletShares 2015 Corporate Bond ETF
12/31/2015
$21.67973


BSJF
Guggenheim BulletShares 2015 High Yield Corporate Bond ETF
12/31/2015
$25.74107


BSCE
Guggenheim BulletShares 2014 Corporate Bond ETF
12/31/2014
$21.15144


BSJE
Guggenheim BulletShares 2014 High Yield Corporate Bond ETF
12/31/2014
$26.25136


BSCD
Guggenheim BulletShares 2013 Corporate Bond ETF
12/31/2013
$20.76709


BSJD
Guggenheim BulletShares 2013 High Yield Corporate Bond ETF
12/31/2013
$25.56137


BSCC
Guggenheim BulletShares 2012 Corporate Bond ETF
12/31/2012
$20.45780


BSJC
Guggenheim BulletShares 2012 High Yield Corporate Bond ETF
12/31/2012
$25.41900


BSCB
Guggenheim BulletShares 2011 Corporate Bond ETF
12/30/2011
$20.11990



Guggenheim Corporate Bond BulletShares. During the final six to twelve months of the year of maturity, bonds held within a Guggenheim BulletShares Corporate Bond ETF will mature and proceeds will be reinvested in cash and cash equivalents causing the ETF's yield to decrease.
Guggenheim High Yield Corporate Bond BulletShares. During the year of maturity, bonds held within a Guggenheim BulletShares High Yield Corporate Bond ETF will mature and proceeds will be reinvested in cash and cash equivalents causing the ETF's yield to decrease.  

1 The funds do not seek to return any predetermined amount at maturity, and the amount an investor receives may be worth more or less than their original investment. In contrast, when an individual bond matures, an investor typically receives the bond’s par (or face) value.The Funds have designated years of maturity and will terminate on or about December 31st of their respective maturity year. In connection with such termination, each Fund will make a cash distribution to then-current shareholders of its net assets after making appropriate provisions for any liabilities of the Fund. The Funds do not seek to return any predetermined amount at maturity. In the final six to twelve months of operation, as the bonds held by the Fund mature, the Fund's portfolio will transition to cash and cash equivalents, including without limitation U.S. Treasury Bills and investment-grade commercial paper, which may result in a lower yield than the yields of the bonds previously held by the Fund and/or prevailing yields for bonds in the market. The Funds will terminate on or about the date above without requiring approval by the Trust's Board of Trustees (the "Board") or Fund shareholders. The Board may change the termination date to an earlier or later date if a majority of the Board determines the change to be in the best interest of the Funds.







 
 

Subscribe to ETF Yield Emails
 

Important Dates: 2017 BulletShares Maturities
Final day of trading: 12.28.2017
Maturity distribution announcement date: 12.28.2017
Maturity distribution effective date: 12.29.2017
Maturity distribution payable date: 12.29.2017




Questions?
Call our Guggenheim ETF Knowledge Center at 888.WHY-ETFS or 888.949.3837






Want to learn more?
BulletShares Maturity FAQs


Understanding the Maturity Process




×
Understanding the Maturity Process


 





Watch Video







The Funds have designated years of maturity ranging from 2017 to 2026 and will terminate on or about December 31st of their respective maturity year. In connection with such termination, each Fund will make a cash distribution to then-current shareholders of its net assets after making appropriate provisions for any liabilities of the Fund. The Funds do not seek to return any predetermined amount at maturity. In the final six months of operation, as the bonds held by the Fund mature, the Fund's portfolio will transition to cash and cash equivalents, including without limitation U.S. Treasury Bills and investment-grade commercial paper, which may result in a lower yield than the yields of the bonds previously held by the Fund and/or prevailing yields for bonds in the market. The Funds will terminate on or about the date above without requiring approval by the Trust's Board of Trustees (the "Board") or Fund shareholders. The Board may change the termination date to an earlier or later date if a majority of the Board determines the change to be in the best interest of the Funds.
RISK CONSIDERATIONS
Investors should consider the following risk factors and special considerations associated with investing in the Funds, which may cause you to lose money, including the entire principal amount that you invest. Interest Rate Risk: As interest rates rise, the value of fixed-income securities held by the Funds are likely to decrease. Securities with longer durations tend to be more sensitive to interest rate changes, making them more volatile than securities with shorter durations. Credit/Default Risk: The risk that issuers or guarantors of debt instruments or the counterparty to a derivatives contract (BulletShares Corporate Bond ETFs only), repurchase agreement or loan of portfolio securities is unable or unwilling to make timely interest and/or principal payments or otherwise honor its obligations. Debt instruments are subject to varying degrees of credit risk, which may be reflected in credit ratings. Securities issued by the U.S. government have limited credit risk. Credit rating downgrades and defaults (failure to make interest or principal payment) may potentially reduce the Funds’ income and share prices. Asset Class Risk: The bonds in the Funds’ portfolio may underperform the returns of other bonds or indexes that track other industries, markets, asset classes or sectors. Call Risk/Prepayment Risk: During periods of falling interest rates, an issuer of a callable bond may exercise its right to pay principal on an obligation earlier than expected. This may result in the Funds having to reinvest proceeds at lower interest rates, resulting in a decline in the Funds’ income. Extension Risk: The risk that an issuer will exercise its right to pay principal on an obligation later than expected. This may happen when there is a rise in interest rates. Under these circumstances, the value of the obligation will decrease and the Funds’ performance may suffer from its inability to invest in higher yielding securities. Income Risk: The risk that falling interest rates will cause the Funds’ income to decline.Liquidity Risk: If the Funds invest in illiquid securities or securities that become illiquid, Fund returns may be reduced because the Funds may be unable to sell the illiquid securities at an advantageous time or price. Declining Yield Risk: During the final year of the Funds’ operations, as the bonds held by the Funds mature and the Funds’ portfolio transitions to cash and cash equivalents, the Funds’ yield will generally tend to move toward the yield of cash and cash equivalents and thus may be lower than the yields of the bonds previously held by the Funds and/or prevailing yields for bonds in the market. Fluctuation of Yield and Liquidation Amount Risk: The Funds, unlike a direct investment in a bond that has a level coupon payment and a fixed payment at maturity, will make distributions of income that vary over time. Unlike a direct investment in bonds, the breakdown of returns between Fund distributions and liquidation proceeds are not predictable at the time of your investment. For example, at times during the Funds’ existence, it may make distributions at a greater (or lesser) rate than the coupon payments received on the Funds’ portfolio, which will result in the Funds returning a lesser (or greater) amount on liquidation than would otherwise be the case. The rate of Fund distribution payments may adversely affect the tax characterization of your returns from an investment in the Funds relative to a direct investment in corporate bonds. If the amount you receive as liquidation proceeds upon the Funds’ termination is higher or lower than your cost basis, you may experience a gain or loss for tax purposes. In addition the Funds are subject to Non-Correlation Risk, Replication Management Risk, Issuer-Specific Changes, and Non-Diversified Fund Risk. The investment-grade corporate bond ETFs also entail the following risks. Foreign Issuers Risk: Investing in U.S. registered, dollar-denominated bonds of foreign corporations which have different risks than investing in U.S. companies. These include currency, political, and economic risk, as well as less market liquidity, generally greater market volatility and less complete financial information than for U.S. issuers. Derivatives Risk: The Funds may invest in certain types of derivatives contracts, including futures, options and swaps which, increases the risk of loss for the Funds. The high-yield corporate bond ETFs also entail the following risks: High-Yield Securities Risk: The Funds invest in bonds that are rated below investment-grade and are considered to be “junk” securities. While these securities generally offer a higher current yield than that available from higher grade issues, they typically involve greater risk. The ability of issuers of high-yield securities to make timely payments of interest and principal may be adversely impacted by adverse changes in general economic conditions, changes in the financial condition of the issuers and price fluctuations in response to changes in interest rates. High-yield securities are less liquid than investment-grade securities and may be difficult to price or sell, particularly in times of negative sentiment toward high-yield securities. Concentration Risk: If the Index concentrates in an industry or group of industries the Fund’s investments will be concentrated accordingly. In such event, the value of the Fund’s shares may rise and fall more than the value of shares of a fund that invests in securities of companies in a broader range of industries. In addition, the high-yield corporate bond ETFs may entail some or all of the following sector risks. Financial Services Sector Risk, Consumer Staples Sector Risk, Telecommunications Sector Risk, and Consumer Discretionary Sector Risk. Please read each Fund’s prospectus for more detailed information on these risks and considerations. As with any investment, you should consider how your investment will be taxed. The tax information contained in the prospectus is provided as general information.
BulletShares®, BulletShares® USD Corporate Bond Index, and BulletShares® USD High Yield Corporate Bond Index are trademarks of Guggenheim Index ServicesSM and have been licensed for use by Guggenheim Investments. Guggenheim Index ServicesSM is an affiliate of Guggenheim Investments.










Subscribe to Our Perspectives

Your browser does not support iframes.


Your browser does not support iframes.




Follow us




















OUR FIRM
News

Press Releases

Firm Overview

Heritage
Guiding Principles
Careers


OUR PRODUCTS
Exchange Traded Funds

Unit Investment Trusts

Mutual Funds

Closed-End Funds

Currency Shares

Variable Insurance Funds

Indices


OUR PERSPECTIVES
Global CIO Outlook

Macroeconomic Research

Sector Views

Portfolio Strategy

Weekly Viewpoint

In the Media

Resources


SERVICES
Customer Service

My Account

Contact Us

Literature

 
      



PRIVACY POLICY


BUSINESS CONTINUITY


LEGAL INFORMATION








            Guggenheim Investments represents the investment management businesses of Guggenheim Partners, LLC ("Guggenheim").
         Guggenheim Funds Distributors, LLC is an affiliate of Guggenheim.
        



Read a prospectus and summary prospectus (if available) carefully before investing. It contains the investment objective, risks charges, expenses and the other information, which should be considered carefully before investing. To obtain a prospectus and summary prospectus (if available) click here or call 800.820.0888.
Investing involves risk, including the possible loss of principal.

*Guggenheim Investments total asset figure is as of 3.31.2017. The assets include leverage of $11.7bn for assets under management and $0.4bn for assets for which we provide administrative services.
            Guggenheim Investments represents the investment management businesses of Guggenheim Partners, LLC ("Guggenheim"), which includes Security Investors, LLC ("SI"), Guggenheim Funds Investment Advisors, LLC, ("GFIA") and Guggenheim Partners Investment Management ("GPIM") the investment advisers to the referenced funds. Securities offered through Guggenheim Funds Distributors, LLC, an affiliate of Guggenheim, SI, GFIA and GPIM.



        ©
            
        Guggenheim Investments. All rights reserved.
    

Research our firm with FINRA Broker Check.

• Not FDIC Insured • No Bank Guarantee • May Lose Value
This website is directed to and intended for use by citizens or residents of the United States of America only. The material provided on this website is not intended as a recommendation or as investment advice of any kind, including in connection with rollovers, transfers, and distributions. Such material is not provided in a fiduciary capacity, may not be relied upon for or in connection with the making of investment decisions, and does not constitute a solicitation of an offer to buy or sell securities. All content has been provided for informational or educational purposes only and is not intended to be and should not be construed as legal or tax advice and/or a legal opinion. Always consult a financial, tax and/or legal professional regarding your specific situation. Investing involves risk, including the possible loss of principal.




 



                    By choosing an option below, the next time you return to the site, your home page will automatically
                    be set to this site. You can change your preference at any time.
                


 Institutional Investor
                    

 Financial Professional
                    

 Individual Investor
                    
Save










                We have saved your site preference as Institutional Investors. To change this, update your preferences.
            







×
 



United States Important Legal Information
By confirming below that you are an Institutional Investor, you will gain access to information on this website (the “Website”) that is intended exclusively for Institutional Investors and, as such, the information should not be relied upon by individual investors. This Website and any product, content, information, tools or services provided or available through the Website (collectively, the “Services”) are provided to Institutional Investors for informational purposes only and do not constitute a recommendation to buy or sell any security or fund interest. Nothing on the Website shall be considered a solicitation for the offering of any investment product or service to any person in any jurisdiction where such solicitation or offering may not lawfully be made. By accessing this Website, you expressly acknowledge and agree that the Website and the Services provided on or through the Website are provided on an as is/as available basis, and except as partnered by law, neither Guggenheim Investments and it parents, subsidiaries and affiliates nor any third party has any responsibility to maintain the website or the Services offered on or through the Website or to supply corrections or updates for the same. You understand that the information provided on this Website is not intended to provide, and should not be relied upon for, tax, legal, accounting or investment advice. You also agree that the terms provided herein with respect to the access and use of the Website are supplemental to and shall not void or modify the Terms of Use in effect for the Website. The information on this Website is solely intended for use by Institutional Investors as defined below: banks, savings and loan associations, insurance companies, and registered investment companies; registered investment advisers; individual investors and other entities with total assets of at least $50 million; governmental entities; employee benefit (retirement) plans, or multiple employee benefit plans offered to employees of the same employer, that in the aggregate have at least 100 participants, but does not include any participant of such plans; member firms or registered person of such a member; or person(s) acting solely on behalf of any such Institutional Investor.
By clicking the "I confirm" information link the user agrees that: “I have read the terms detailed and confirm that I am an Institutional Investor and that I wish to proceed.”

                 

                

I confirm





                                Save Selection





















	ETF Strategies | Guggenheim Investments






















































Home ETF 
ETF Strategies




ETF Strategies
 



Guggenheim Investments is one of the nation’s top ETF providers. Our investment teams have been breaking new ground in ETFs for more than a decade—with many industry “firsts,” like CurrencyShares, BulletShares (target-maturity fixed income ETFs), and equal-weight as well as pure-style equity ETFs. We offer one of the broadest ETF line-ups in the industry, which investors can use to access new markets and asset classes, and potentially invest more efficiently in traditional assets—through strategies like target-maturity fixed income and innovative equity-index ETFs.

Fixed Income
In addition to Enhanced Short Duration ETF (GSY) and Total Return Bond ETF (GTO), Guggenheim delivers a range of solutions across the yield curve—in both investment grade and high yield bonds. Our BulletShares ETFs were an industry first, giving investors the opportunity to gain targeted yield curve exposure in a cost-efficient, transparent ETF vehicle.

Guggenheim Enhanced Short Duration ETF (GSY)
Guggenheim Total Return Bond ETF (GTO)
Guggenheim BulletShares 2017 Corporate Bond ETF (BSCH)
Guggenheim BulletShares 2018 Corporate Bond ETF (BSCI)
Guggenheim BulletShares 2019 Corporate Bond ETF (BSCJ)
Guggenheim BulletShares 2020 Corporate Bond ETF (BSCK)
Guggenheim BulletShares 2021 Corporate Bond ETF (BSCL)
Guggenheim BulletShares 2022 Corporate Bond ETF (BSCM)
Guggenheim BulletShares 2023 Corporate Bond ETF (BSCN)
Guggenheim BulletShares 2024 Corporate Bond ETF (BSCO)
Guggenheim BulletShares 2025 Corporate Bond ETF (BSCP)
Guggenheim BulletShares 2026 Corporate Bond ETF (BSCQ)
Guggenheim BulletShares 2017 High Yield Corporate Bond ETF (BSJH)
Guggenheim BulletShares 2018 High Yield Corporate Bond ETF (BSJI)
Guggenheim BulletShares 2019 High Yield Corporate Bond ETF (BSJJ)
Guggenheim BulletShares 2020 High Yield Corporate Bond ETF (BSJK)
Guggenheim BulletShares 2021 High Yield Corporate Bond ETF (BSJL)
Guggenheim BulletShares 2022 High Yield Corporate Bond ETF (BSJM)
Guggenheim BulletShares 2023 High Yield Corporate Bond ETF (BSJN)
Guggenheim BulletShares 2024 High Yield Corporate Bond ETF (BSJO)

 
Developing Markets
Guggenheim offers multiple developing markets options, including broad-based Emerging Markets, BRIC, Frontier and individual country exposure (China). Our China ETFs provide exposure to equities, fixed income and currency.

Guggenheim BRIC ETF (EEB)
Guggenheim China All Cap ETF (YAO)
Guggenheim China Real Estate ETF (TAO)
Guggenheim China Small Cap ETF (HAO)
Guggenheim China Technology ETF (CQQQ)
Guggenheim Frontier Markets ETF (FRN)

 
Equal Weight
Guggenheim’s equal weight equity ETFs are designed to provide performance potential, diversification* opportunities and disciplined rebalancing. Our equal weight strategies are based on equal weight indices from indexing leaders such as S&P, Dow Jones, and MSCI.

Guggenheim S&P 500® Equal Weight ETF (RSP)
Guggenheim S&P 100® Equal Weight ETF (OEW)
Guggenheim S&P MidCap 400® Equal Weight ETF (EWMC)
Guggenheim S&P SmallCap 600® Equal Weight ETF (EWSC)
Guggenheim S&P 500® Equal Weight Consumer Discretionary ETF (RCD)
Guggenheim S&P 500® Equal Weight Consumer Staples ETF (RHS)
Guggenheim S&P 500® Equal Weight Energy ETF (RYE)
Guggenheim S&P 500® Equal Weight Financials ETF (RYF)
Guggenheim S&P 500® Equal Weight Health Care ETF (RYH)
Guggenheim S&P 500® Equal Weight Industrials ETF (RGI)
Guggenheim S&P 500® Equal Weight Materials ETF (RTM)
Guggenheim S&P 500® Equal Weight Real Estate ETF (EWRE)
Guggenheim S&P 500® Equal Weight Technology ETF (RYT)
Guggenheim S&P 500® Equal Weight Utilities ETF (RYU)

 
Equity Income
Guggenheim’s equity income ETFs offer a range of approaches to increasing yield. Investors can use our multi-asset ETFs to diversify* beyond dividend paying stocks, without creating undue sector concentration. We offer global dividend paying portfolios, as well as exposure to dividend paying securities from commodity rich countries (Australia, Brazil and Canada).

Guggenheim International Multi-Asset Income ETF (HGI)
Guggenheim Multi-Asset Income ETF (CVY)
Guggenheim S&P Global Dividend Opportunities Index ETF (LVL)
Guggenheim S&P High Income Infrastructure ETF (GHII)

 
Pure Style
Our pure style ETFs are designed to more precisely track the performance characteristics of style universes (i.e., growth equities and value equities), compared to conventional style portfolios. The goal is to help investors better capture the spread, and capitalize on performance differences, between styles.

Guggenheim S&P 500® Pure Growth ETF (RPG)
Guggenheim S&P 500® Pure Value ETF (RPV)
Guggenheim S&P MidCap 400® Pure Growth ETF (RFG) (EWMC)
Guggenheim S&P MidCap 400® Pure Value ETF (RFV)
Guggenheim S&P SmallCap 600® Pure Growth ETF (RZG)
Guggenheim S&P SmallCap 600® Pure Value ETF (RZV)

 
Core
Our core ETFs are designed to provide broad-based exposure to market segments, providing core building blocks for client portfolios.

Guggenheim Dow Jones Industrial Average® Dividend ETF (DJD)
Guggenheim Mid-Cap Core ETF (CZA)
Wilshire Micro-Cap ETF (WMCR)
Wilshire US REIT ETF (WREI)

 
Strategies
Our strategies ETFs allow advisors to incorporate broad market themes in their clients’ portfolios—from sentiment-driven positions, to strategies that exploit corporate events and activities (e.g., spin-offs).

Guggenheim Defensive Equity ETF (DEF)
Guggenheim Insider Sentiment ETF (NFO)
Guggenheim Large Cap Optimized Diversification ETF (OPD)
Guggenheim Large Cap Optimized Diversification ETF (OPD)
Guggenheim S&P Spin-Off ETF (CSD)
Guggenheim U.S. Large Cap Optimized Volatility ETF (OVLC)

 
Target Beta
For hard-to-access sectors of the market, or for efficient ways to express strategic market views, investors can turn to Guggenheim’s target beta strategies. In addition, investors can use these strategies to target niche market sectors such as timber, shipping, and energy.

Guggenheim Canadian Energy Income ETF (ENY)
Guggenheim MSCI Global Timber ETF (CUT)
Guggenheim S&P 500® Top 50 ETF (XLG)
Guggenheim S&P Global Water Index ETF (CGW)
Guggenheim Shipping ETF (SEA)
Guggenheim Solar ETF (TAN)


*Diversification neither assures a profit nor eliminates the risk of experiencing investment losses.

Guggenheim Investments ETFs may not be suitable for all investors. • Investment returns and principal value will fluctuate so that when shares are redeemed, they may be worth more or less than original cost. Most investors will also incur customary brokerage commissions when buying or selling shares of an ETF. • Investments in securities and derivatives, in general, are subject to market risks that may cause their prices to fluctuate over time. • ETF Shares may trade below their net asset value (“NAV”). The NAV of shares will fluctuate with changes in the market value of an ETF's holdings. In addition, there can be no assurance that an active trading market for shares will develop or be maintained. • Please review a prospectus carefully for more information of the risks associated with each ETF.



Resources
Fixed Income
Developing Markets
Equal Weight
Equity Income
Pure Style
Core
Strategies















Subscribe to Our Perspectives

Your browser does not support iframes.


Your browser does not support iframes.




Follow us




















OUR FIRM
News

Press Releases

Firm Overview

Heritage
Guiding Principles
Careers


OUR PRODUCTS
Exchange Traded Funds

Unit Investment Trusts

Mutual Funds

Closed-End Funds

Currency Shares

Variable Insurance Funds

Indices


OUR PERSPECTIVES
Global CIO Outlook

Macroeconomic Research

Sector Views

Portfolio Strategy

Weekly Viewpoint

In the Media

Resources


SERVICES
Customer Service

My Account

Contact Us

Literature

 
      



PRIVACY POLICY


BUSINESS CONTINUITY


LEGAL INFORMATION








            Guggenheim Investments represents the investment management businesses of Guggenheim Partners, LLC ("Guggenheim").
         Guggenheim Funds Distributors, LLC is an affiliate of Guggenheim.
        



Read a prospectus and summary prospectus (if available) carefully before investing. It contains the investment objective, risks charges, expenses and the other information, which should be considered carefully before investing. To obtain a prospectus and summary prospectus (if available) click here or call 800.820.0888.
Investing involves risk, including the possible loss of principal.

*Guggenheim Investments total asset figure is as of 3.31.2017. The assets include leverage of $11.7bn for assets under management and $0.4bn for assets for which we provide administrative services.
            Guggenheim Investments represents the investment management businesses of Guggenheim Partners, LLC ("Guggenheim"), which includes Security Investors, LLC ("SI"), Guggenheim Funds Investment Advisors, LLC, ("GFIA") and Guggenheim Partners Investment Management ("GPIM") the investment advisers to the referenced funds. Securities offered through Guggenheim Funds Distributors, LLC, an affiliate of Guggenheim, SI, GFIA and GPIM.



        ©
            
        Guggenheim Investments. All rights reserved.
    

Research our firm with FINRA Broker Check.

• Not FDIC Insured • No Bank Guarantee • May Lose Value
This website is directed to and intended for use by citizens or residents of the United States of America only. The material provided on this website is not intended as a recommendation or as investment advice of any kind, including in connection with rollovers, transfers, and distributions. Such material is not provided in a fiduciary capacity, may not be relied upon for or in connection with the making of investment decisions, and does not constitute a solicitation of an offer to buy or sell securities. All content has been provided for informational or educational purposes only and is not intended to be and should not be construed as legal or tax advice and/or a legal opinion. Always consult a financial, tax and/or legal professional regarding your specific situation. Investing involves risk, including the possible loss of principal.




 



                    By choosing an option below, the next time you return to the site, your home page will automatically
                    be set to this site. You can change your preference at any time.
                


 Institutional Investor
                    

 Financial Professional
                    

 Individual Investor
                    
Save










                We have saved your site preference as Institutional Investors. To change this, update your preferences.
            







×
 



United States Important Legal Information
By confirming below that you are an Institutional Investor, you will gain access to information on this website (the “Website”) that is intended exclusively for Institutional Investors and, as such, the information should not be relied upon by individual investors. This Website and any product, content, information, tools or services provided or available through the Website (collectively, the “Services”) are provided to Institutional Investors for informational purposes only and do not constitute a recommendation to buy or sell any security or fund interest. Nothing on the Website shall be considered a solicitation for the offering of any investment product or service to any person in any jurisdiction where such solicitation or offering may not lawfully be made. By accessing this Website, you expressly acknowledge and agree that the Website and the Services provided on or through the Website are provided on an as is/as available basis, and except as partnered by law, neither Guggenheim Investments and it parents, subsidiaries and affiliates nor any third party has any responsibility to maintain the website or the Services offered on or through the Website or to supply corrections or updates for the same. You understand that the information provided on this Website is not intended to provide, and should not be relied upon for, tax, legal, accounting or investment advice. You also agree that the terms provided herein with respect to the access and use of the Website are supplemental to and shall not void or modify the Terms of Use in effect for the Website. The information on this Website is solely intended for use by Institutional Investors as defined below: banks, savings and loan associations, insurance companies, and registered investment companies; registered investment advisers; individual investors and other entities with total assets of at least $50 million; governmental entities; employee benefit (retirement) plans, or multiple employee benefit plans offered to employees of the same employer, that in the aggregate have at least 100 participants, but does not include any participant of such plans; member firms or registered person of such a member; or person(s) acting solely on behalf of any such Institutional Investor.
By clicking the "I confirm" information link the user agrees that: “I have read the terms detailed and confirm that I am an Institutional Investor and that I wish to proceed.”

                 

                

I confirm





                                Save Selection





















	ETF Fund Action Reporting | Guggenheim Investments




















































Home ETF 
Fund Action Reporting




Fund Action Reporting






Certain Guggenheim Investments products have taken organizational actions that affect their basis. These organizational actions can include, but are not limited to fund mergers, fund closures, share splits and return of capital. Please see the Fund Actions listed below for Exchange Traded Funds.




Date
Product Name
Action
IRS FORM 8937


12/22/16
RYF - Guggenheim S&P 500® Equal Weight Financials ETF
Return of Capital
PDF


10/28/16
EMRE - Guggenheim Emerging Markets Real Estate ETF
Return of Capital
PDF


1/26/16
EWRI - Guggenheim Russell 1000® Equal Weight ETF
Fund Merger
PDF


12/23/15
RSP - Guggenheim S&P 500® Equal Weight ETF
Return of Capital
PDF


12/23/15
RZG - Guggenheim S&P SmallCap 600 Pure Growth ETF
Return of Capital
PDF


12/23/15
RYT - Guggenheim S&P 500® Equal Weight Technology ETF
Return of Capital
PDF


12/23/15
RGI - Guggenheim S&P 500® Equal Weight Industrials ETF
Return of Capital
PDF


12/23/15
RYF - Guggenheim S&P 500® Equal Weight Financials ETF
Return of Capital
PDF


12/23/15
RFG - Guggenheim S&P MidCap 400® Pure Growth ETF
Return of Capital
PDF


12/23/15
EWMC - Guggenheim S&P MidCap 400® Equal Weight ETF
Return of Capital
PDF


3/27/2014
EWSC - Guggenheim S&P SmallCap 600® Equal Weight ETF
Return of Capital
PDF


3/27/2014
HGI - Guggenheim International Multi-Asset Income ETF
Return of Capital
PDF


12/24/2013
ENY - Guggenheim Canadian Energy Income ETF 
Return of Capital
PDF


3/26/2013
RPG - Guggenheim S&P 500® Pure Growth
Return of Capital
PDF


3/28/2012
ENY - Guggenheim Canadian Energy Income ETF 
Return of Capital
PDF


3/28/2012
WREI - Wilshire US REIT ETF
Return of Capital
PDF


3/28/2012
CVY - Guggenheim Multi-Asset Income ETF
Return of Capital
PDF





Split information is shown in order of most recent event.
Ex-Date: For splits, the date that the share price changes to reflect the split.
Date of record: Date on which an individual must own shares in order to be eligible to receive split price.




Fund
Date of Split
Split Type
Reason
Ex Date


Guggenheim Solar ETF
02/14/12
One-for-10 Reverse Split
Increase share price
02/15/12


S&P 500 Equal Weight ETF (RSP)
04/24/06 
Four-for-One Split
Decrease share price
04/27/06








NOTE: If you track your investments through one of the popular online financial sites, keep in mind that these sites may or may not reflect the change in NAV for these funds. You may have to manually change the number of shares on the site. Please contact the online financial site directly for details on how to update your account.
















Subscribe to Our Perspectives

Your browser does not support iframes.


Your browser does not support iframes.




Follow us




















OUR FIRM
News

Press Releases

Firm Overview

Heritage
Guiding Principles
Careers


OUR PRODUCTS
Exchange Traded Funds

Unit Investment Trusts

Mutual Funds

Closed-End Funds

Currency Shares

Variable Insurance Funds

Indices


OUR PERSPECTIVES
Global CIO Outlook

Macroeconomic Research

Sector Views

Portfolio Strategy

Weekly Viewpoint

In the Media

Resources


SERVICES
Customer Service

My Account

Contact Us

Literature

 
      



PRIVACY POLICY


BUSINESS CONTINUITY


LEGAL INFORMATION








            Guggenheim Investments represents the investment management businesses of Guggenheim Partners, LLC ("Guggenheim").
         Guggenheim Funds Distributors, LLC is an affiliate of Guggenheim.
        



Read a prospectus and summary prospectus (if available) carefully before investing. It contains the investment objective, risks charges, expenses and the other information, which should be considered carefully before investing. To obtain a prospectus and summary prospectus (if available) click here or call 800.820.0888.
Investing involves risk, including the possible loss of principal.

*Guggenheim Investments total asset figure is as of 3.31.2017. The assets include leverage of $11.7bn for assets under management and $0.4bn for assets for which we provide administrative services.
            Guggenheim Investments represents the investment management businesses of Guggenheim Partners, LLC ("Guggenheim"), which includes Security Investors, LLC ("SI"), Guggenheim Funds Investment Advisors, LLC, ("GFIA") and Guggenheim Partners Investment Management ("GPIM") the investment advisers to the referenced funds. Securities offered through Guggenheim Funds Distributors, LLC, an affiliate of Guggenheim, SI, GFIA and GPIM.



        ©
            
        Guggenheim Investments. All rights reserved.
    

Research our firm with FINRA Broker Check.

• Not FDIC Insured • No Bank Guarantee • May Lose Value
This website is directed to and intended for use by citizens or residents of the United States of America only. The material provided on this website is not intended as a recommendation or as investment advice of any kind, including in connection with rollovers, transfers, and distributions. Such material is not provided in a fiduciary capacity, may not be relied upon for or in connection with the making of investment decisions, and does not constitute a solicitation of an offer to buy or sell securities. All content has been provided for informational or educational purposes only and is not intended to be and should not be construed as legal or tax advice and/or a legal opinion. Always consult a financial, tax and/or legal professional regarding your specific situation. Investing involves risk, including the possible loss of principal.




 



                    By choosing an option below, the next time you return to the site, your home page will automatically
                    be set to this site. You can change your preference at any time.
                


 Institutional Investor
                    

 Financial Professional
                    

 Individual Investor
                    
Save










                We have saved your site preference as Institutional Investors. To change this, update your preferences.
            







×
 



United States Important Legal Information
By confirming below that you are an Institutional Investor, you will gain access to information on this website (the “Website”) that is intended exclusively for Institutional Investors and, as such, the information should not be relied upon by individual investors. This Website and any product, content, information, tools or services provided or available through the Website (collectively, the “Services”) are provided to Institutional Investors for informational purposes only and do not constitute a recommendation to buy or sell any security or fund interest. Nothing on the Website shall be considered a solicitation for the offering of any investment product or service to any person in any jurisdiction where such solicitation or offering may not lawfully be made. By accessing this Website, you expressly acknowledge and agree that the Website and the Services provided on or through the Website are provided on an as is/as available basis, and except as partnered by law, neither Guggenheim Investments and it parents, subsidiaries and affiliates nor any third party has any responsibility to maintain the website or the Services offered on or through the Website or to supply corrections or updates for the same. You understand that the information provided on this Website is not intended to provide, and should not be relied upon for, tax, legal, accounting or investment advice. You also agree that the terms provided herein with respect to the access and use of the Website are supplemental to and shall not void or modify the Terms of Use in effect for the Website. The information on this Website is solely intended for use by Institutional Investors as defined below: banks, savings and loan associations, insurance companies, and registered investment companies; registered investment advisers; individual investors and other entities with total assets of at least $50 million; governmental entities; employee benefit (retirement) plans, or multiple employee benefit plans offered to employees of the same employer, that in the aggregate have at least 100 participants, but does not include any participant of such plans; member firms or registered person of such a member; or person(s) acting solely on behalf of any such Institutional Investor.
By clicking the "I confirm" information link the user agrees that: “I have read the terms detailed and confirm that I am an Institutional Investor and that I wish to proceed.”

                 

                

I confirm





                                Save Selection





















ETF Products | Guggenheim Investments





























 



                    By choosing an option below, the next time you return to the site, your home page will automatically
                    be set to this site. You can change your preference at any time.
                


 Advisor
                    

 Individual Investor
                    

 Institutional Investor
                    
Save










                We have saved your site preference as Institutional Investors. To change this, update your preferences.
            











Home
ETF
Products









 

 



            — OR —
        




Select a Category



Category
Fixed-Income
Core
Developing Market
Equal Weight
Pure Style
Strategies
Target Beta
Investment Strategies
Smart Beta
Equity
Sector
Thematic
Active








Search Type:

All
Sector
Holdings

 

Sector:

Select Sector...
Consumer Discretionary
Consumer Staples
Energy
Financials
Health Care
Industrials
Information Technology
Materials
Real Estate
Telecommunication Services
Utilities


 

0%

100%
 Weightings

 

Includes:

All
Any

 








                     
                










ETF Product List






Resources
ETF Product List
BulletShares® ETF Summary List
ETF Performance at a Glance









Filter 

Reset






All
Fixed Income
Core
Developing Market
Equal Weight
Equity Income
Pure Style
Strategies
Target Beta


Smart Beta
Equity
Sector
Thematic
Active









Fixed Income


as of 7/27/2017




Fund Name
Ticker 
iNAV Ticker
Inception Date
Total Assets




Guggenheim BulletShares 2017 Corporate Bond ETF
BSCH
BSCH.IV
6/7/2010
$651,955,535


Guggenheim BulletShares 2017 High Yield Corporate Bond ETF
BSJH
BSJH.IV
4/25/2012
$492,328,471


Guggenheim BulletShares 2018 Corporate Bond ETF
BSCI
BSCI.IV
3/28/2012
$1,039,821,354


Guggenheim BulletShares 2018 High Yield Corporate Bond ETF
BSJI
BSJI.IV
4/25/2012
$1,111,665,271


Guggenheim BulletShares 2019 Corporate Bond ETF
BSCJ
BSCJ.IV
3/28/2012
$999,813,546


Guggenheim BulletShares 2019 High Yield Corporate Bond ETF
BSJJ
BSJJ.IV
9/24/2013
$804,921,654


Guggenheim BulletShares 2020 Corporate Bond ETF
BSCK
BSCK.IV
3/28/2012
$982,624,550


Guggenheim BulletShares 2020 High Yield Corporate Bond ETF
BSJK
BSJK.IV
9/24/2013
$517,339,484


Guggenheim BulletShares 2021 Corporate Bond ETF
BSCL
BSCL.IV
7/16/2013
$728,956,713


Guggenheim BulletShares 2021 High Yield Corporate Bond ETF
BSJL
BSJL.IV
9/17/2014
$191,519,343


Guggenheim BulletShares 2022 Corporate Bond ETF
BSCM
BSCM.IV
7/16/2013
$564,128,980


Guggenheim BulletShares 2022 High Yield Corporate Bond ETF
BSJM
BSJM.IV
9/17/2014
$139,992,330


Guggenheim BulletShares 2023 Corporate Bond ETF
BSCN
BSCN.IV
9/17/2014
$208,214,591


Guggenheim BulletShares 2023 High Yield Corporate Bond ETF
BSJN
BSJN.IV
10/7/2015
$43,077,734


Guggenheim BulletShares 2024 Corporate Bond ETF
BSCO
BSCO.IV
9/17/2014
$172,367,913


Guggenheim BulletShares 2024 High Yield Corporate Bond ETF
BSJO
BSJO.IV
9/14/2016
$23,229,708


Guggenheim BulletShares 2025 Corporate Bond ETF
BSCP
BSCP.IV
10/7/2015
$71,424,144


Guggenheim BulletShares 2026 Corporate Bond ETF
BSCQ
BSCQ.IV
9/14/2016
$32,483,665


Guggenheim Total Return Bond ETF
GTO
GTO.IV
2/10/2016
$52,149,608


Guggenheim Ultra Short Duration ETF
GSY
GSY.IV
2/12/2008
$1,106,692,648












Core


as of 7/27/2017




Fund Name
Ticker 
iNAV Ticker
Inception Date
Total Assets




Guggenheim Dow Jones Industrial Average Dividend ETF
DJD
DJD.IV
12/16/2015
$9,269,464


Guggenheim Mid-Cap Core ETF
CZA
CZA.IV
4/2/2007
$195,266,520


Wilshire Micro-Cap ETF
WMCR
WMCR.IV
9/21/2006
$28,376,805


Wilshire US REIT ETF
WREI
WREI.IV
3/9/2010
$23,783,844












Developing Market


as of 7/27/2017




Fund Name
Ticker 
iNAV Ticker
Inception Date
Total Assets




Guggenheim BRIC ETF
EEB
EED
9/21/2006
$82,191,311


Guggenheim China All-Cap ETF
YAO
YAO.IV
10/19/2009
$25,418,910


Guggenheim China Real Estate ETF
TAO
TAO.IV
12/18/2007
$56,307,539


Guggenheim China Small Cap ETF
HAO
HAO.IV
1/30/2008
$90,971,879


Guggenheim China Technology ETF
CQQQ
CQQQ.IV
12/8/2009
$141,765,585


Guggenheim Frontier Markets ETF
FRN
FRN.IV
6/12/2008
$70,839,871












Equal Weight


as of 7/27/2017




Fund Name
Ticker 
iNAV Ticker
Inception Date
Total Assets




Guggenheim MSCI Emerging Markets Equal Country Weight ETF
EWEM
EWEM.IV
12/3/2010
$13,355,008


Guggenheim S&P 100® Equal Weight ETF
OEW
OEW.IV
6/30/2016
$4,553,236


Guggenheim S&P 500® Equal Weight Consumer Discretionary ETF
RCD
RCD.IV
11/1/2006
$84,020,835


Guggenheim S&P 500® Equal Weight Consumer Staples ETF
RHS
RHS.IV
11/1/2006
$506,768,100


Guggenheim S&P 500® Equal Weight Energy ETF
RYE
RYE.IV
11/1/2006
$201,896,698


Guggenheim S&P 500® Equal Weight ETF
RSP
RSP.IV
4/24/2003
$13,778,572,944


Guggenheim S&P 500® Equal Weight Financials ETF
RYF
RYF.IV
11/1/2006
$324,117,068


Guggenheim S&P 500® Equal Weight Health Care ETF
RYH
RYH.IV
11/1/2006
$713,898,795


Guggenheim S&P 500® Equal Weight Industrials ETF
RGI
RGI.IV
11/1/2006
$216,063,386


Guggenheim S&P 500® Equal Weight Materials ETF
RTM
RTM.IV
11/1/2006
$115,888,853


Guggenheim S&P 500® Equal Weight Real Estate ETF
EWRE
EWRE.IV
8/13/2015
$27,754,512


Guggenheim S&P 500® Equal Weight Technology ETF
RYT
RYT.IV
11/1/2006
$1,355,209,531


Guggenheim S&P 500® Equal Weight Utilities ETF
RYU
RYU.IV
11/1/2006
$197,265,638


Guggenheim S&P MidCap 400® Equal Weight ETF
EWMC
EWMC.IV
12/3/2010
$121,076,779


Guggenheim S&P SmallCap 600® Equal Weight ETF
EWSC
EWSC.IV
12/3/2010
$35,173,352












Equity Income


as of 7/27/2017




Fund Name
Ticker 
iNAV Ticker
Inception Date
Total Assets




Guggenheim International Multi-Asset Income ETF
HGI
HGI.IV
7/11/2007
$13,575,799


Guggenheim Multi-Asset Income ETF
CVY
CYM
9/21/2006
$356,682,815


Guggenheim S&P Global Dividend Opportunities Index ETF
LVL
LVL.IV
6/25/2007
$60,847,099


Guggenheim S&P High Income Infrastructure ETF
GHII
GHII.IV
2/11/2015
$35,578,083












Pure Style


as of 7/27/2017




Fund Name
Ticker 
iNAV Ticker
Inception Date
Total Assets




Guggenheim S&P 500® Pure Growth ETF
RPG
RPG.IV
3/1/2006
$2,149,092,606


Guggenheim S&P 500® Pure Value ETF
RPV
RPV.IV
3/1/2006
$887,197,205


Guggenheim S&P MidCap 400® Pure Growth ETF
RFG
RFG.IV
3/1/2006
$556,373,843


Guggenheim S&P MidCap 400® Pure Value ETF
RFV
RFV.IV
3/1/2006
$125,344,080


Guggenheim S&P SmallCap 600® Pure Growth ETF
RZG
RZG.IV
3/1/2006
$199,284,037


Guggenheim S&P SmallCap 600® Pure Value ETF
RZV
RZV.IV
3/1/2006
$172,917,917












Strategies


as of 7/27/2017




Fund Name
Ticker 
iNAV Ticker
Inception Date
Total Assets




Guggenheim Defensive Equity ETF
DEF
DEF.IV
12/15/2006
$177,048,459


Guggenheim Insider Sentiment ETF
NFO
NFA
9/21/2006
$71,616,491


Guggenheim Large Cap Optimized Diversification ETF
OPD
OPD.IV
4/19/2016
$1,358,029


Guggenheim Multi-Factor Large Cap ETF
GMFL
GMFL.IV
6/20/2017
$2,503,788


Guggenheim Raymond James SB-1 Equity ETF
RYJ
RYJ.IV
5/19/2006
$196,139,103


Guggenheim S&P Spin-Off ETF
CSD
CSD.IV
12/15/2006
$197,632,213


Guggenheim U.S. Large Cap Optimized Volatility ETF
OVLC
OVLC.IV
5/10/2016
$1,429,422












Target Beta


as of 7/27/2017




Fund Name
Ticker 
iNAV Ticker
Inception Date
Total Assets




Guggenheim Canadian Energy Income ETF
ENY
ENY.IV
7/3/2007
$25,194,586


Guggenheim MSCI Global Timber ETF
CUT
CUT.IV
11/9/2007
$200,001,773


Guggenheim S&P 500® Top 50 ETF
XLG
XLG.IV
5/4/2005
$657,781,093


Guggenheim S&P Global Water Index ETF
CGW
CGW.IV
5/14/2007
$588,677,443


Guggenheim Shipping ETF
SEA
SEA.IV
6/11/2010
$116,676,614


Guggenheim Solar ETF
TAN
TAN.IV
4/15/2008
$337,332,265











Results


as of 7/27/2017




Fund Name
Ticker 
iNAV Ticker
Inception Date
Total Assets
Category
Additional Categories
Cusip




Guggenheim BulletShares 2017 Corporate Bond ETF
BSCH
BSCH.IV
6/7/2010
$651,955,535
Fixed Income

18383M548


Guggenheim BulletShares 2017 High Yield Corporate Bond ETF
BSJH
BSJH.IV
4/25/2012
$492,328,471
Fixed Income

18383M399


Guggenheim BulletShares 2018 Corporate Bond ETF
BSCI
BSCI.IV
3/28/2012
$1,039,821,354
Fixed Income

18383M530


Guggenheim BulletShares 2018 High Yield Corporate Bond ETF
BSJI
BSJI.IV
4/25/2012
$1,111,665,271
Fixed Income

18383M381


Guggenheim BulletShares 2019 Corporate Bond ETF
BSCJ
BSCJ.IV
3/28/2012
$999,813,546
Fixed Income

18383M522


Guggenheim BulletShares 2019 High Yield Corporate Bond ETF
BSJJ
BSJJ.IV
9/24/2013
$804,921,654
Fixed Income

18383M373


Guggenheim BulletShares 2020 Corporate Bond ETF
BSCK
BSCK.IV
3/28/2012
$982,624,550
Fixed Income

18383M514


Guggenheim BulletShares 2020 High Yield Corporate Bond ETF
BSJK
BSJK.IV
9/24/2013
$517,339,484
Fixed Income

18383M365


Guggenheim BulletShares 2021 Corporate Bond ETF
BSCL
BSCL.IV
7/16/2013
$728,956,713
Fixed Income

18383M266


Guggenheim BulletShares 2021 High Yield Corporate Bond ETF
BSJL
BSJL.IV
9/17/2014
$191,519,343
Fixed Income

18383M225


Guggenheim BulletShares 2022 Corporate Bond ETF
BSCM
BSCM.IV
7/16/2013
$564,128,980
Fixed Income

18383M258


Guggenheim BulletShares 2022 High Yield Corporate Bond ETF
BSJM
BSJM.IV
9/17/2014
$139,992,330
Fixed Income

18383M217


Guggenheim BulletShares 2023 Corporate Bond ETF
BSCN
BSCN.IV
9/17/2014
$208,214,591
Fixed Income

18383M241


Guggenheim BulletShares 2023 High Yield Corporate Bond ETF
BSJN
BSJN.IV
10/7/2015
$43,077,734
Fixed Income

18383M183


Guggenheim BulletShares 2024 Corporate Bond ETF
BSCO
BSCO.IV
9/17/2014
$172,367,913
Fixed Income

18383M233


Guggenheim BulletShares 2024 High Yield Corporate Bond ETF
BSJO
BSJO.IV
9/14/2016
$23,229,708
Fixed Income

18383M134


Guggenheim BulletShares 2025 Corporate Bond ETF
BSCP
BSCP.IV
10/7/2015
$71,424,144
Fixed Income

18383M191


Guggenheim BulletShares 2026 Corporate Bond ETF
BSCQ
BSCQ.IV
9/14/2016
$32,483,665
Fixed Income

18383M126


Guggenheim Total Return Bond ETF
GTO
GTO.IV
2/10/2016
$52,149,608
Fixed Income
active
18385P705


Guggenheim Ultra Short Duration ETF
GSY
GSY.IV
2/12/2008
$1,106,692,648
Fixed Income
active
18383M654


Guggenheim Dow Jones Industrial Average Dividend ETF
DJD
DJD.IV
12/16/2015
$9,269,464
Core
smart beta|equity
18383M175


Guggenheim Mid-Cap Core ETF
CZA
CZA.IV
4/2/2007
$195,266,520
Core
equity
18383M720


Wilshire Micro-Cap ETF
WMCR
WMCR.IV
9/21/2006
$28,376,805
Core
equity
18383M308


Wilshire US REIT ETF
WREI
WREI.IV
3/9/2010
$23,783,844
Core
equity|sector|thematic
18383M472


Guggenheim BRIC ETF
EEB
EED
9/21/2006
$82,191,311
Developing Market
equity|thematic
18383M100


Guggenheim China All-Cap ETF
YAO
YAO.IV
10/19/2009
$25,418,910
Developing Market
equity
18385P101


Guggenheim China Real Estate ETF
TAO
TAO.IV
12/18/2007
$56,307,539
Developing Market
equity|sector|thematic
18383Q861


Guggenheim China Small Cap ETF
HAO
HAO.IV
1/30/2008
$90,971,879
Developing Market
equity
18383Q853


Guggenheim China Technology ETF
CQQQ
CQQQ.IV
12/8/2009
$141,765,585
Developing Market
equity|sector|thematic
18383Q135


Guggenheim Frontier Markets ETF
FRN
FRN.IV
6/12/2008
$70,839,871
Developing Market
equity|thematic
18383Q838


Guggenheim MSCI Emerging Markets Equal Country Weight ETF
EWEM
EWEM.IV
12/3/2010
$13,355,008
Equal Weight
smart beta|equity|thematic
78355W536


Guggenheim S&P 100® Equal Weight ETF
OEW
OEW.IV
6/30/2016
$4,553,236
Equal Weight
smart beta|equity
78355W478


Guggenheim S&P 500® Equal Weight Consumer Discretionary ETF
RCD
RCD.IV
11/1/2006
$84,020,835
Equal Weight
smart beta|equity|sector|thematic
78355W882


Guggenheim S&P 500® Equal Weight Consumer Staples ETF
RHS
RHS.IV
11/1/2006
$506,768,100
Equal Weight
smart beta|equity|sector|thematic
78355W874


Guggenheim S&P 500® Equal Weight Energy ETF
RYE
RYE.IV
11/1/2006
$201,896,698
Equal Weight
smart beta|equity|sector|thematic
78355W866


Guggenheim S&P 500® Equal Weight ETF
RSP
RSP.IV
4/24/2003
$13,778,572,944
Equal Weight
smart beta|equity
78355W106


Guggenheim S&P 500® Equal Weight Financials ETF
RYF
RYF.IV
11/1/2006
$324,117,068
Equal Weight
smart beta|equity|sector|thematic
78355W858


Guggenheim S&P 500® Equal Weight Health Care ETF
RYH
RYH.IV
11/1/2006
$713,898,795
Equal Weight
smart beta|equity|sector|thematic
78355W841


Guggenheim S&P 500® Equal Weight Industrials ETF
RGI
RGI.IV
11/1/2006
$216,063,386
Equal Weight
smart beta|equity|sector|thematic
78355W833


Guggenheim S&P 500® Equal Weight Materials ETF
RTM
RTM.IV
11/1/2006
$115,888,853
Equal Weight
smart beta|equity|sector|thematic
78355W825


Guggenheim S&P 500® Equal Weight Real Estate ETF
EWRE
EWRE.IV
8/13/2015
$27,754,512
Equal Weight
smart beta|equity|sector|thematic
78355W486


Guggenheim S&P 500® Equal Weight Technology ETF
RYT
RYT.IV
11/1/2006
$1,355,209,531
Equal Weight
smart beta|equity|sector|thematic
78355W817


Guggenheim S&P 500® Equal Weight Utilities ETF
RYU
RYU.IV
11/1/2006
$197,265,638
Equal Weight
smart beta|equity|sector|thematic
78355W791


Guggenheim S&P MidCap 400® Equal Weight ETF
EWMC
EWMC.IV
12/3/2010
$121,076,779
Equal Weight
smart beta|equity
78355W577


Guggenheim S&P SmallCap 600® Equal Weight ETF
EWSC
EWSC.IV
12/3/2010
$35,173,352
Equal Weight
smart beta|equity
78355W585


Guggenheim International Multi-Asset Income ETF
HGI
HGI.IV
7/11/2007
$13,575,799
Equity Income
smart beta|equity
18383Q804


Guggenheim Multi-Asset Income ETF
CVY
CYM
9/21/2006
$356,682,815
Equity Income
smart beta|equity
18383M506


Guggenheim S&P Global Dividend Opportunities Index ETF
LVL
LVL.IV
6/25/2007
$60,847,099
Equity Income
smart beta|equity
18383M860


Guggenheim S&P High Income Infrastructure ETF
GHII
GHII.IV
2/11/2015
$35,578,083
Equity Income
smart beta|equity|sector|thematic
18383Q721


Guggenheim S&P 500® Pure Growth ETF
RPG
RPG.IV
3/1/2006
$2,149,092,606
Pure Style
smart beta|equity
78355W403


Guggenheim S&P 500® Pure Value ETF
RPV
RPV.IV
3/1/2006
$887,197,205
Pure Style
smart beta|equity
78355W304


Guggenheim S&P MidCap 400® Pure Growth ETF
RFG
RFG.IV
3/1/2006
$556,373,843
Pure Style
smart beta|equity
78355W601


Guggenheim S&P MidCap 400® Pure Value ETF
RFV
RFV.IV
3/1/2006
$125,344,080
Pure Style
smart beta|equity
78355W502


Guggenheim S&P SmallCap 600® Pure Growth ETF
RZG
RZG.IV
3/1/2006
$199,284,037
Pure Style
smart beta|equity
78355W809


Guggenheim S&P SmallCap 600® Pure Value ETF
RZV
RZV.IV
3/1/2006
$172,917,917
Pure Style
smart beta|equity
78355W700


Guggenheim Defensive Equity ETF
DEF
DEF.IV
12/15/2006
$177,048,459
Strategies
smart beta|equity
18383M878


Guggenheim Insider Sentiment ETF
NFO
NFA
9/21/2006
$71,616,491
Strategies
smart beta|equity|thematic
18383M209


Guggenheim Large Cap Optimized Diversification ETF
OPD
OPD.IV
4/19/2016
$1,358,029
Strategies
smart beta|equity
18383M167


Guggenheim Multi-Factor Large Cap ETF
GMFL
GMFL.IV
6/20/2017
$2,503,788
Strategies

78355W460


Guggenheim Raymond James SB-1 Equity ETF
RYJ
RYJ.IV
5/19/2006
$196,139,103
Strategies
equity|thematic
18383M613


Guggenheim S&P Spin-Off ETF
CSD
CSD.IV
12/15/2006
$197,632,213
Strategies
equity|thematic
18383M605


Guggenheim U.S. Large Cap Optimized Volatility ETF
OVLC
OVLC.IV
5/10/2016
$1,429,422
Strategies
smart beta|equity
18385P804


Guggenheim Canadian Energy Income ETF
ENY
ENY.IV
7/3/2007
$25,194,586
Target Beta
equity|sector|thematic
18383Q606


Guggenheim MSCI Global Timber ETF
CUT
CUT.IV
11/9/2007
$200,001,773
Target Beta
equity|sector|thematic
18383Q879


Guggenheim S&P 500® Top 50 ETF
XLG
XLG.IV
5/4/2005
$657,781,093
Target Beta
equity
78355W205


Guggenheim S&P Global Water Index ETF
CGW
CGW.IV
5/14/2007
$588,677,443
Target Beta
equity|sector|thematic
18383Q507


Guggenheim Shipping ETF
SEA
SEA.IV
6/11/2010
$116,676,614
Target Beta
equity|thematic
18383Q796


Guggenheim Solar ETF
TAN
TAN.IV
4/15/2008
$337,332,265
Target Beta
equity|sector|thematic
18383Q739










Guggenheim Investments ETFs may not be suitable for all investors. • Investment returns and principal value will fluctuate so that when shares are redeemed, they may be worth more or less than original cost. Most investors will also incur customary brokerage commissions when buying or selling shares of an ETF. • Investments in securities and derivatives, in general, are subject to market risks that may cause their prices to fluctuate over time. • ETF Shares may trade below their net asset value ("NAV"). The NAV of shares will fluctuate with changes in the market value of an ETF's holdings. In addition, there can be no assurance that an active trading market for shares will develop or be maintained. • Please review a prospectus carefully for more information of the risks associated with each ETF.
            













Subscribe to Our Perspectives

Your browser does not support iframes.


Your browser does not support iframes.




Follow us




















OUR FIRM
News

Press Releases

Firm Overview

Heritage

Careers


OUR PRODUCTS
Exchange Traded Funds

Unit Investment Trusts

Mutual Funds

Closed-End Funds

Currency Shares

Variable Insurance Funds

Indices


OUR PERSPECTIVES
Global CIO Outlook

Macroeconomic Research

Portfolio Strategy

Sector Views

Weekly Viewpoint

In the Media

Resources


SERVICES
Customer Service

Contact Us

Literature




PRIVACY POLICY


BUSINESS CONTINUITY


LEGAL INFORMATION











                        Read a prospectus and summary prospectus (if available) carefully before
                        investing. It contains the investment objective, risks charges, expenses and the other information,
                        which should be considered carefully before investing. To obtain a prospectus and summary prospectus
                        (if available) click here or call 800.820.0888.
                    



Investing involves risk, including the possible loss of principal.


                Guggenheim Investments represents the investment management business of
                Guggenheim Partners, LLC ("Guggenheim"), which includes Security Investors, LLC ("SI"),
                Guggenheim Funds Investments Advisors, LLC ("GFIA") and Guggenheim Partners Investment Management ("GPIM")
                the investment advisors to the referenced funds.
            
© 2017 Guggenheim Investments. All Rights Reserved. 

Research our firm with FINRA Broker Check.

• Not FDIC Insured • No Bank Guarantee • May Lose Value
This website is directed to and intended for use by citizens or residents of the United States of America only. The material provided on this website is not intended as a recommendation or as investment advice of any kind, including in connection with rollovers, transfers, and distributions. Such material is not provided in a fiduciary capacity, may not be relied upon for or in connection with the making of investment decisions, and does not constitute a solicitation of an offer to buy or sell securities. All content has been provided for informational or educational purposes only and is not intended to be and should not be construed as legal or tax advice and/or a legal opinion. Always consult a financial, tax and/or legal professional regarding your specific situation. Investing involves risk, including the possible loss of principal.







	Search Engine Marketing (SEM) - Bing Ads








































































































Skip to content











Sign upSign in


 


















You run your business. We'll help find your customers.
Bing Ads can help build your business and drive your success. Spend $25 and get $100 in advertising credit.†

†Offer details




Get $100 in search advertising when you spend $25 in Bing Ads.







Coupon code class

First name:

Last name:

Email:

Your website URL

Business phone



*Required
Microsoft may contact you to provide updates and special offers about Bing Ads. You can unsubscribe at any time. To learn more you can read the privacy statement.
Type the code from the image:

Enter security code:







             























×
Get $100 in search advertising when you spend $25 in Bing Ads.


†Offer Details: Offer expires December 31, 2017.  Valid only for new Bing Ads customers who are first party recipients of the offer email. A new Bing Ads customer is one that has not advertised on Bing Ads before. Enter promotional coupon code and spend $25 (applies to threshold and prepaid accounts) to receive $100 in Bing Ads credits. Limit one promotion code per new Bing Ads customer. Promotional code must be redeemed within thirty (30) days of Bing Ads new customer account creation. Ad campaign costs accrued before receiving a credit, as well as costs accrued after all credits are used, will be charged to the payment method associated with the Bing Ads account. If customer payment fails, the coupon amount will not be applied.  Ads will continue to run and accrue costs after any promotional credit has been used up. Any portion of the credit not used within ninety (90) days of credit redemption will expire and can't be carried over even if the Bing Ads Customer switches their payment method. Offer valid only to residents of the United States. In order for the offer to be valid, a form of payment must be entered into your account prior to redemption of the promotional code and prior to your account going live to take advantage of the credit. This offer may not be combined with any other offer, promotional code coupon or discount, separated, redeemed for cash, transferred, sold, or bartered. Microsoft, in its sole discretion, can close your account for any suspected coupon abuse. Refund of the $25 is not permitted.  See Bing Ads Terms and Conditions for more details at sign-up. Other terms and conditions may apply.  Microsoft reserves the right to cancel, change, or suspend this offer at any time without notice.









See how Bing Ads works



Customers search


Customers see your ad


Customers contact you


Watch how Bing Ads works  
 








×
How Bing Ads works

















Help more customers find you
See how Bing can attract customers your Google AdWords campaigns can't.

Reach 137 million searchers on the Bing Network.1
Tap into 32.9% of the search marketplace.2
Get in front of searchers who spend 16 percent more than the average internet searcher.2











Powerful network. Powerful benefits.



Reach across devicesConnect with customers looking for your business anytime, anywhere, on any device.


Go global or localReach people in the Bing Network everywhere or focus on cities, counties and areas within a certain distance from your business.


Easy to importIf you're already using another product like Google Adwords, it's easy to pull that campaign into Bing Ads.








You control your costs

 Free sign-upJoin Bing Ads for free and control your account at every step.


 Only pay for clicksPay just when customers click on your ad. No click, no charge.


 No minimum feeStart advertising with a budget that works best for your business.









 



The advantage we gain in cost per click gives us a great return on investment — more than 35 percent better than Google AdWords.
Scott Redgate, search engine marketing manager — CJ Pony Parts
By using Bing Ads features like Image Extensions and Sitelink Extensions, this auto parts retailer races to convert customers and beat its competition.

 Read about driving more conversions







 



We might not get as much of the volume as with Google AdWords, but the volume of the traffic that we get converts really well at a lower cost.
Scott Schult, Executive Vice President of Marketing — Myrtle Beach Area Convention and Visitors Bureau
The Myrtle Beach Area Convention and Visitors Bureau uses Bing Ads to drive site traffic and tourism at lower cost.

 Read about getting better ROI








Better results for less cost. That's as simple as I can make it. If I look at the quality of the traffic we get for the dollars we spend on Bing Ads, our ROI is fantastic.
Alex Littlewood, CEO   Motoroso
Motoroso, a market network for auto enthusiasts, gets better results for less cost and reaches a high-value audience with Bing Ads.

 Read about attracting quality traffic



 









Import your AdWords campaigns

Save time by importing your Google AdWords campaigns into Bing Ads to get ads live quickly.


Sign in with your Microsoft account (or create one) to get started on Bing Ads.


From within the Bing Ads interface, select the Import from Google AdWords option.


Enter your Google AdWords credentials and select the campaign you want to import.










Preview your ad

Get found online with search engine marketing. Make the most of your marketing dollars and drive customers to your business.
See how Bing Ads can work for you




















Get started today
Give us a few details about your business to create a Bing Ads account and get it up and running.


  
Sign up
Get started with Bing Ads 
Signing up is always free.













FAQ


Is Bing Ads right for me?

Is Bing Ads right for my business?
All types of businesses find value and success with Bing Ads. Whether you're focused on local calls and foot traffic, or want to drive traffic to your website from across the country or around the world. Bing Ads has solutions for you.
I already appear in search results for free. Why should I pay for advertising?
Your current customers may search for your business by name, aiming it easy to find you in search results. But customers you've yet to reach are more likely searching for general terms that wouldn't necessarily bring up your business in search results. Advertising next to relevant Bing search results puts your business front and center with interested customers you otherwise might not reach.
What is the difference between SEO and SEM? Which one is right for me?
Search engine optimization (SEO) is adjusting your website to improve your natural ranking in search results. You cannot pay to improve your website ranking on Bing or Yahoo, thus we often refer to these results and unpaid or "organic" search results.

	Clicks from SEO are free. But SEO also requires technical expertise and involves some factors over which you have only limited control.

	Search engine marketing (SEM) is paid advertising that appears next to or above unpaid (or "organic") search results. These paid ads are purchased through Bing Ads.

	You pay for SEM clicks. But SEM gives you more control over when your website appears on results pages and you decide how much you want to pay. And you can measure which ads are working and quickly improve your results.

	You don't have to choose between SEO and SEM. You can do both!
If my time is limited, should I still try Bing ads?
Yes! Call a Bing Ads specialist at 877-635-3561*and we’ll set up your first campaign for you for free. We’ll give you tips on getting the most out of your ads and set you up for success. We’re here to help.




About Bing Ads

Where does my ad appear?
Your ads could appear on the top or to the right of Bing, Yahoo, and MSN search results. And you can choose to target your ads to different geographic regions, times or days of the week, and even demographics.
What determines my ad position?
Bing Ads is a pay-per-click (PPC) advertising system. You bid based on how much you are willing to pay per each click on your ad. Because webpages have a limited number of places to show ads, we auction those spaces. You are bidding against other advertisers to get your ads into the space you want. So if you bid on the keyword "shoe", you will have to beat the bids of the other advertisers who are also bidding on "shoe." You determine how much you are willing to bid.
	Your ad position is based on several things, including:
	
How closely your ad and website fit with the terms that are searched (relevance).
How your bid compares to other bids in the Bing Ads auction.
How strongly your ad has performed in the past and how often it has been clicked (click-through rate).

	The stronger you are in these areas, the better your chances of winning the top ad position.




How to use Bing Ads

How can I use Bing Ads to drive more people to my website?
Here are some tips to get better results:
	
Review your budget and bid strategy. If your ad keeps pausing, your budget limit may be set too low. Competitive bids help your ad stay in a strong position to catch eyes and get more clicks to your website.
Expand your targeting, both for location and for devices (computer, mobile and tablet).
Make sure your ads and website are relevant to the keywords you bid on. Would someone searching your terms expect to see and ad for your business?


How can I keep my costs down?
While your first instinct may be to lower your budget, first try lowering your maximum bids. Yes, this could mean fewer customers visit your site. But if you increase your quality score and build ads with a strong performance history, you may be able to win a good ad position with a lower bid. That would lower your cost=per-click and help stretch your budget.
How do I know if Bing Ads is working?
View a wide range of performance trends in your account to quickly see key stats: ad clicks, the number of times your ad appeared (impressions), spend, average cost-per-click, click-through rate, average ad position, cost per acquisition, and conversions. You can also run performance reports to get insights into how well your campaigns are doing.
Can I run more than one ad?
Yes! In fact, we encourage it. Only one ad will show at a time but running multiple ads lets you test different approaches to see what's working best with your target customers. Frequently, businesses try out different ads for specific products or pages.




Getting started with Bing Ads

How do I get started?
Sign up for Bing Ads
Which keywords should I choose?
You have a few options to help choose your keywords. First you'll want to think of the terms one of your customers might use to search for your products and offerings. Those search terms are a great starting point. Then you can use tools right in your account to find more keywords. Within Bing Ads, click Campaigns on the top of the page. Click the Keywords tab, and then click Add Keywords. This will let you:
	
Search for new keywords based on one you enter.
Search a website for keywords.
Search your destination URLs for keywords.


How can I write a good ad?
Here are a few tips that can help make your ad stand out.
	
Keep your ads relevant. One way to improve relevance is to use your customer's most popular search terms in your ad titles and txt.
Describe what sets your product apart.
Use your customers' language. Use words and writing tone that are likely to attract your typical customer.
Be specific. This clearer and more specific your offering, the better. For example, rather than "big discount," specify and exact percentage, such as "50 percent off."
Give customers a reason to click your ad right now. Offer a specific call to action, such as encouraging customers to request a brochure or consultation, download a free e-book, subscribe to a newsletter, or take advantage of a limited-time discount.























Sign up with Bing Ads to get started







































	ETF Yields | Guggenheim Investments



















































Home ETF 
Yields








 

 



        — OR —
    




                    Select a Category
                    


Category
Fixed-Income
Core
Developing Market
Equal Weight
Pure Style
Strategies
Target Beta
Investment Strategies
Smart Beta
Equity
Sector
Thematic
Active








Search Type:

All
Sector
Holdings

 

Sector:

Select Sector...
Consumer Discretionary
Consumer Staples
Energy
Financials
Health Care
Industrials
Information Technology
Materials
Real Estate
Telecommunication Services
Utilities


 

0%

100%
 Weightings

 

Includes:

All
Any

 








                 
            










ETF Yields




Resources
Subscribe to ETF Yield Updates
ETF Product List
BulletShares® ETF Summary List
ETF Performance at a Glance










Filter 



Reset










Fixed Income


as of 
                            
                            
                                        7/26/17

Export to Excel





Ticker
Fund Name
30-Day SEC Yield
Distribution Rate
Weighted Average Yield to Maturity
Weighted Average Yield to Worst
Cusip




BSCH
Guggenheim BulletShares 2017 Corporate Bond ETF
1.16%
1.09%
1.66%
1.64%
18383M548


BSCI
Guggenheim BulletShares 2018 Corporate Bond ETF
1.44%
1.44%
1.66%
1.64%
18383M530


BSCJ
Guggenheim BulletShares 2019 Corporate Bond ETF
1.65%
1.69%
1.86%
1.84%
18383M522


BSCK
Guggenheim BulletShares 2020 Corporate Bond ETF
1.88%
1.93%
2.05%
2.04%
18383M514


BSCL
Guggenheim BulletShares 2021 Corporate Bond ETF
2.17%
2.21%
2.35%
2.34%
18383M266


BSCM
Guggenheim BulletShares 2022 Corporate Bond ETF
2.39%
2.35%
2.57%
2.55%
18383M258


BSCN
Guggenheim BulletShares 2023 Corporate Bond ETF
2.59%
2.60%
2.77%
2.76%
18383M241


BSCO
Guggenheim BulletShares 2024 Corporate Bond ETF
2.94%
2.95%
3.10%
3.09%
18383M233


BSCP
Guggenheim BulletShares 2025 Corporate Bond ETF
3.05%
2.93%
3.23%
3.21%
18383M191


BSCQ
Guggenheim BulletShares 2026 Corporate Bond ETF
3.06%
2.90%
3.29%
3.29%
18383M126


BSJH
Guggenheim BulletShares 2017 High Yield Corporate Bond ETF
1.36%
1.87%
1.99%
1.55%
18383M399


BSJI
Guggenheim BulletShares 2018 High Yield Corporate Bond ETF
2.90%
3.45%
4.20%
3.08%
18383M381


BSJJ
Guggenheim BulletShares 2019 High Yield Corporate Bond ETF
3.79%
4.75%
5.12%
3.83%
18383M373


BSJK
Guggenheim BulletShares 2020 High Yield Corporate Bond ETF
4.23%
4.63%
5.17%
4.44%
18383M365


BSJL
Guggenheim BulletShares 2021 High Yield Corporate Bond ETF
4.68%
4.89%
5.52%
4.73%
18383M225


BSJM
Guggenheim BulletShares 2022 High Yield Corporate Bond ETF
4.97%
5.11%
5.62%
4.76%
18383M217


BSJN
Guggenheim BulletShares 2023 High Yield Corporate Bond ETF
5.06%
5.01%
5.67%
5.18%
18383M183


BSJO
Guggenheim BulletShares 2024 High Yield Corporate Bond ETF
4.89%
4.83%
5.43%
5.16%
18383M134


GSY
Guggenheim Ultra Short Duration ETF
1.21%
1.25%
1.79%
1.77%
18383M654


GTO
Guggenheim Total Return Bond ETF
2.34%
2.74%
2.82%
2.72%
18385P705









Equity



Export to Excel









Ticker
Fund Name
30-Day SEC Yield
12 Month Yield
Cusip




CVY
Guggenheim Multi-Asset Income ETF
4.42%
4.24%



DJD
Guggenheim Dow Jones Industrial Average Dividend ETF
2.61%
2.79%



ENY
Guggenheim Canadian Energy Income ETF
2.90%
2.95%



GHII
Guggenheim S&P High Income Infrastructure ETF
5.29%
4.47%



HGI
Guggenheim International Multi-Asset Income ETF
3.26%
3.21%



LVL
Guggenheim S&P Global Dividend Opportunities Index ETF
3.28%
4.04%



SEA
Guggenheim Shipping ETF
4.51%
4.05%



WREI
Wilshire US REIT ETF
3.35%
2.73%








Guggenheim Corporate Bond BulletShares. During the final six months of the year of maturity, bonds held within a Guggenheim BulletShares Corporate Bond ETF will mature and proceeds will be reinvested in cash and cash equivalents causing the ETF's yield to decrease.
Guggenheim High Yield Corporate Bond BulletShares. During the year of maturity, bonds held within a Guggenheim BulletShares High Yield Corporate Bond ETF will mature and proceeds will be reinvested in cash and cash equivalents causing the ETF's yield to decrease.
An adjustment for this decrease is not included in the yield values shown above as standard yield calculations represent a point in time weighted average of each underlying portfolio constituent.
For a further understanding of the maturity process, view the BulletShares Maturity Page or call us. Financial professionals can contact the ETF Knowledge Center 888.WHY.ETFs and individual investors can contact 800.820.0888.
30-Day SEC Yield 
This yield figure reflects the theoretical income that a portfolio would generate, including dividends and interest, during the period after deducting a fund’s expenses for the period. A fund’s actual net earnings for a given period under generally accepted accounting principles may differ from this standardized yield.
Distribution Rate 
The annualized rate an investor would receive if the most recent fund distribution stayed the same going forward. This rate does not represent the total return of a fund. The distribution rate is calculated by annualizing the most recent distribution and dividing by a fund’s NAV from the as-of-date.
Weighted Average Yield to Maturity
Weighted Average Yield to Maturity is the discount rate that calculates the present value of a bond’s anticipated cash flows with its market price (including accrued interest). A fund's Average YTM is defined as the weighted average of a fund’s individual bond holding YTMs and is based upon Net Asset Value (“NAV”). This does not include fees and expenses.
Weighted Average Yield to Worst
Weighted Average Yield to Worst uses the lowest discount rate for all possible redemption date scenarios with its market price. A fund’s Average YTW is defined as the weighted average of a fund’s individual bond holding YTWs and is based upon the price of each individual bond that was utilized to calculate that day’s net asset value and does not include fund fees and expenses.
12 Month Yield
The annualized rate an investor has received if all distributions paid by the fund over the last twelve months were considered as a proportion of the fund's value on the as-of date. Twelve month yield is calculated by summing all interest, dividend and capital gains and non-taxable return of capital distributions paid by the fund over the past twelve months and dividing by the fund's NAV from the as-of date.
Performance displayed represents past performance, which is no guarantee of future results. Investment returns and principal value will fluctuate so that when shares are redeemed, they may be worth more or less than original cost. Total returns reflect the reinvestment of all dividends. Current performance may be lower or higher than the performance data quoted. For up-to-date fund performance, including performance current to the most recent month-end, please visit the  ETF performance page . ETFs are subject to third party transaction fees/commissions. Net asset value (NAV) is calculated by subtracting total liabilities from total assets, then dividing by the number of shares outstanding. Market close is the last price at which shares are traded. Fund shares may trade at, above or below NAV. For additional information, see the fund’s prospectus.Performance results for periods under one year are short-term and may not provide an adequate basis for evaluating the performance potential of the fund over varying market conditions or economic cycles.











Subscribe to Our Perspectives

Your browser does not support iframes.


Your browser does not support iframes.




Follow us




















OUR FIRM
News

Press Releases

Firm Overview

Heritage
Guiding Principles
Careers


OUR PRODUCTS
Exchange Traded Funds

Unit Investment Trusts

Mutual Funds

Closed-End Funds

Currency Shares

Variable Insurance Funds

Indices


OUR PERSPECTIVES
Global CIO Outlook

Macroeconomic Research

Sector Views

Portfolio Strategy

Weekly Viewpoint

In the Media

Resources


SERVICES
Customer Service

My Account

Contact Us

Literature

 
      



PRIVACY POLICY


BUSINESS CONTINUITY


LEGAL INFORMATION








            Guggenheim Investments represents the investment management businesses of Guggenheim Partners, LLC ("Guggenheim").
         Guggenheim Funds Distributors, LLC is an affiliate of Guggenheim.
        



Read a prospectus and summary prospectus (if available) carefully before investing. It contains the investment objective, risks charges, expenses and the other information, which should be considered carefully before investing. To obtain a prospectus and summary prospectus (if available) click here or call 800.820.0888.
Investing involves risk, including the possible loss of principal.

*Guggenheim Investments total asset figure is as of 3.31.2017. The assets include leverage of $11.7bn for assets under management and $0.4bn for assets for which we provide administrative services.
            Guggenheim Investments represents the investment management businesses of Guggenheim Partners, LLC ("Guggenheim"), which includes Security Investors, LLC ("SI"), Guggenheim Funds Investment Advisors, LLC, ("GFIA") and Guggenheim Partners Investment Management ("GPIM") the investment advisers to the referenced funds. Securities offered through Guggenheim Funds Distributors, LLC, an affiliate of Guggenheim, SI, GFIA and GPIM.



        ©
            
        Guggenheim Investments. All rights reserved.
    

Research our firm with FINRA Broker Check.

• Not FDIC Insured • No Bank Guarantee • May Lose Value
This website is directed to and intended for use by citizens or residents of the United States of America only. The material provided on this website is not intended as a recommendation or as investment advice of any kind, including in connection with rollovers, transfers, and distributions. Such material is not provided in a fiduciary capacity, may not be relied upon for or in connection with the making of investment decisions, and does not constitute a solicitation of an offer to buy or sell securities. All content has been provided for informational or educational purposes only and is not intended to be and should not be construed as legal or tax advice and/or a legal opinion. Always consult a financial, tax and/or legal professional regarding your specific situation. Investing involves risk, including the possible loss of principal.




 



                    By choosing an option below, the next time you return to the site, your home page will automatically
                    be set to this site. You can change your preference at any time.
                


 Institutional Investor
                    

 Financial Professional
                    

 Individual Investor
                    
Save










                We have saved your site preference as Institutional Investors. To change this, update your preferences.
            







×
 



United States Important Legal Information
By confirming below that you are an Institutional Investor, you will gain access to information on this website (the “Website”) that is intended exclusively for Institutional Investors and, as such, the information should not be relied upon by individual investors. This Website and any product, content, information, tools or services provided or available through the Website (collectively, the “Services”) are provided to Institutional Investors for informational purposes only and do not constitute a recommendation to buy or sell any security or fund interest. Nothing on the Website shall be considered a solicitation for the offering of any investment product or service to any person in any jurisdiction where such solicitation or offering may not lawfully be made. By accessing this Website, you expressly acknowledge and agree that the Website and the Services provided on or through the Website are provided on an as is/as available basis, and except as partnered by law, neither Guggenheim Investments and it parents, subsidiaries and affiliates nor any third party has any responsibility to maintain the website or the Services offered on or through the Website or to supply corrections or updates for the same. You understand that the information provided on this Website is not intended to provide, and should not be relied upon for, tax, legal, accounting or investment advice. You also agree that the terms provided herein with respect to the access and use of the Website are supplemental to and shall not void or modify the Terms of Use in effect for the Website. The information on this Website is solely intended for use by Institutional Investors as defined below: banks, savings and loan associations, insurance companies, and registered investment companies; registered investment advisers; individual investors and other entities with total assets of at least $50 million; governmental entities; employee benefit (retirement) plans, or multiple employee benefit plans offered to employees of the same employer, that in the aggregate have at least 100 participants, but does not include any participant of such plans; member firms or registered person of such a member; or person(s) acting solely on behalf of any such Institutional Investor.
By clicking the "I confirm" information link the user agrees that: “I have read the terms detailed and confirm that I am an Institutional Investor and that I wish to proceed.”

                 

                

I confirm





                                Save Selection



















